
Blood of the Monster

1

“I don’t want to stay here. Please let me stay here.”

Evan Ross tugged at his mother’s hand and pulled her away from the front of the small house with a fierce ball. Mrs. Rose turned with an impatient grin on her face.

“Evan—you’re twelve. Don’t act like a child,” he said, releasing his hand from her grasp.

“I love that you say that!” Ivan cried out in pain and crossed his arms in front of his chest.

He softened his brow and reached up to run his hand through Ivan's curly, carrot-colored hair. “And hate me when you do!” She yelled and turned away from him, almost stepping on a broken stone in the trip. “Don't touch my hair. I hate it!

“Well, then you’re judging me,” his mother said, shrugging. He climbed the two flights of stairs and knocked on the door. “You need to stay here until I get back.”

“Why can’t I come with you?” Ivan demanded, crossing his arms. “Just give me one good reason.”

“Your shoes are tied,” her mother replied.

"so?" Evan replied cheerfully. “I like them open.”

“You’re going to leave,” he warned.

“Mom,” Evan said, rubbing his eyes in exasperation, “Have you ever seen someone walk in his shoes because they were undone?”

“Well, no,” her mother admitted, a small smile spreading across her beautiful face.

“You just want to open the conversation,” Evans said, not smiling. “You’re going to leave me here for weeks with a mean old woman and—”

“Evan—that’s enough!” Miss Rose threw back her blonde hair. “Catherine is not a nasty old lady. She’s your dad’s girlfriend. Your girlfriend. And he—”

“He’s a stranger,” cried Evan. He knew it would happen, but he didn't care. How could her mother do that to her? How could he leave her with an old woman he hadn’t seen since he was two years old? What was he supposed to do here alone until his mother returned?

“Evan, we’ve talked about this a thousand times,” his mother said impatiently as she rushed through her friend’s door again. “This is a family tragedy. I just hope you have a good relationship.”

His next words were interrupted by Trigger, Evan’s pink hound, who poked his red head out the back window of the rental car and began barking and howling.

“Now he’s giving me trouble, too!” Mrs. Ross said.

“Can I take it off?” Evan asked hopefully.

"I think you're better," her mother replied. “Trigger is old, and we don’t want him to get heartbroken there. I just hope it doesn’t scare Katherine.

“I’m coming to Targaryen!” Evan called.

He ran into the driveway and locked the car door. With Yp excited, Trigger jumped out and ran in wide circles around Kathryn's small rectangular front yard.

“He doesn’t look like he’s twelve years old,” Evan said, watching the running dog and smiling for the first time that day.

“Yeah. You get a Trigger for company,” Mrs. Rossi said, walking back to the front door. “I’ll be back from Atlanta in a bit. Probably a few weeks. I’m sure your dad and I can find a house By then and then we can be back before you even notice we’re gone.”

"Yeah. Of course," Evan said sarcastically.

The sun dipped behind a large cloud. A shadow fell on the small ground ahead.

Trigger quickly exhausted himself and came to a stop with his tongue hanging out of the ground. Evan bent down and patted the dog's back.

He looked up at the gray room as his mother knocked on the door again. He didn't seem to be inviting. Curtains were drawn over the upstairs windows. A lid was dropped and rested at an extreme angle.

“Mom—why are you knocking?” He asked, slipping his hands into his jacket pockets. "You said Terry Catherine was completely tone deaf."

"Oh." His mother’s face turned red. “You’ve made me so angry, Evans, with all your complaining, I’ve forgotten everything. Of course he cannot hear us.”

How am I going to spend two weeks with an old woman who can't listen to me? Evan wondered.

He remembered listening to his parents two weeks ago when they made the plan. They were sitting across from each other at the dining table.

They thought Ivan was behind. But he was in the hallway, his back against the wall, listening.

He knows his father wouldn’t have let Evan stay with Katherine. “The old woman has a big brain,” Mr. Ross had said. “Look at her. Deaf for twenty years, he refused to read sign language or read lips. How are you going to take care of Evan?”

“He took good care of you when you were a boy,” Mrs. Rose chided.

“That was thirty years ago,” Mr. Ross continued.

“Well, we don’t have a choice,” Evan heard his mother say. “There’s no one else to take her with her. Everyone else is on vacation. You know August is a bad month to move to Atlanta.

“Well, excuse me!” Mr. Ross said sarcastically. “It’s alright, alright. The conversation is closed. You are absolutely right, my friend. We don’t have any choice. That’s Katherine. You take Evan there and fly down to Atlanta.”

“It’s going to be the best thing for him,” Evans heard his mother say. “He needs to learn how to deal with difficult situations. You know, moving to Atlanta, leaving all his friends behind – isn’t going to be easy for Evan either. ”

"Agreed. I said it was fine,” Mr. Ross said impatiently. “He’s ready. Evan is going to be fine. Katherine is a mess, but she’s not doing anything wrong.”

Evan slammed the kitchen chairs against the counter, indicating that his parents were up and their conversation was over.

It was closed. Without a word, she walked out the front door and went to the back room to think about what she had heard.

He leaned against the trunk of a large tree that hid him from the house. It was his thinking place.

Why did her parents never include her in their conversations? He wondered to himself. If they were talking, would he leave with an older woman he’d never met and never say a word? He learned all the family information by listening to the chorus. It wasn’t right.

Evan pulled a small branch from the ground and slammed it against the large trunk.

Tate Catherine was amazing. That’s what his father said. Too bad his father didn’t want to leave Evan with him.

But they had no choice. There is no choice.

Maybe they’ll change their minds and move me to Atlanta with them, Evan thought. Maybe they’ll realize they can’t do this with me.

But now, two weeks later, he was standing in front of Aunt Katherine’s austere house, looking nervously at the red suitcase filled with her belongings that stood beside his mother on the balcony.

There was nothing to be afraid of, he assured himself.

It’s been two weeks. It can be decreased.

But then the words came out before he could think them through: “Ma—what if Katherine is the bad guy?”

“Huh?” The question caught her mother by surprise. "Klanc? Why would she be so mean, Evan ?”

and so saying, as she faced Evan and followed him towards the house, the door opened, and Miss Catherine, a large woman with striking dark hair, filled the door.

Turning to his mother, Evan saw a gun in Kathryn’s hand. He could see that the knife was dripping with blood.



2


Trigger raised his head and began to bark, jumping to his hind legs with each bark.

Startled, Evan’s mother whirled around, almost focusing on the globe.

Evan looked at her nervously with a grin.

A smile formed on Kathryn’s face and she opened the screen door with her free hand.

It was nothing like Evan had pictured. He drew a picture of a small woman with white hair. But Katherine was a large woman, very strong, broad-shouldered, and tall.

She wore a purple-colored horse suit with neat black hair, which was tied up and tied behind her head in a long ponytail that flowed down the back of the suit. She wore no makeup, and her face seemed lost under black hair except for her eyes, which were large, round, and steel blue.

“I was cutting beef,” he said in a surprisingly gruff voice and gripped the blood-stained food. She looked at Ivan. “Do you like beef?”

“Uh… yeah,” she managed to reply, her heart racing as she saw him come out with a raised gun.

Kathryn pushed open the screen door, but neither Evan nor his mother made a move to enter. "It's big," Katherine told Ms. Ross. “Great man. He’s not like his father. I used to call his father Chicken. for he is not bigger than a hen.” He laughed like he’d made a joke.

Mrs. Rose picked up Evan's suitcase, looked him in the eye uneasy. “Yeah… great,” he said.

In fact, Evan was one of the shortest kids in his class. No matter how much he ate, he stayed “as light as a pancake batter,” as his father would say.

“You don’t have to answer me,” said Catherine, and she stepped aside so Mrs. Rose could enter the room with the suitcase. “I can’t hear you.” His voice was as loud as the man's, and he spoke plainly, without the vague accent that some deaf-mutes talk about.

Evan followed his mother to the front of the arena, Trigger yelling at his heels. “Can’t you calm this dog down?” His mother sighed.

“It’s nothing. He doesn’t hear it,” Evans said, motioning to his sister, who was walking into the kitchen to put down the gun.

Katherine returned a few seconds later, her blue eyes fixed on Ivan and her lips pursed, as if reading him. “So you like beef?” He sat on it.

She shook her head.

“Okay,” he said, his face still serious. “I always cooked beef for your father. But he just wanted to skate.”

“What kind of pie?” Evan asked, then blushed when he remembered that Katherine couldn't talk.

“So he’s a good guy? Am I not a troublemaker?” Catherine asked Evan's mother.

Mrs. Rose nodded to look at Ivan. “Where do we put his suitcase?” she asked.

“I can tell when I see him that he’s a good boy,” Katherine said. He reached up to cup Ivan’s face, his hand under his chin, his eyes studying him closely. “Good boy,” he said, pressing his beard tightly. “He likes girls?”

He was still holding his chin, his face lowered to hers. “You’re getting a girlfriend?” she asked, his dark face so high above hers that she could smell his breath.

Evan took a step back, an embarrassed smile crossing his face. "No. Really."

"Yes?" Catherine cried, screaming in his ear. "Yeah? I knew it!” He laughed heartily, glaring at Evan's mother.

“Suitcase?” Mrs. Rose asked, taking the bag.

“Does he like girls?” Kathryn repeated, still laughing. “I could tell. Like his father. Girls are always loved by their father.”

Evan turned to his mother in disappointment. “No, I can’t stay here,” he said, grumbling even though he knew Catherine couldn’t handle it. “Please—don’t do this to me.”

“Her mother replied.” She also whispered. “It leaves you on your own. I’m on target. He’s just trying to be friendly.”

“He likes girls,” Catherine repeated, looking at him with cold blue eyes, her face lowered to Ivan’s again.

“Mom—her breath smells like Trigger’s!” Evan shouted ferociously.

“Evan!” cried Miss Rose angrily. “Stop it! I look forward to your cooperation.”

“I’m going to go make you a patty,” Katherine said, clutching her black bra in one large hand. “Do you want to cancel the patch? I bet you do. What did your father tell you about me, Evan?” She winked at Mrs. Rose. “Did she tell you I’m a scary old witch?”

“No,” Evan replied, looking at his mother.

“No, it’s me!” Kathryn said, laughing again.

Trigger took this moment to start yelling viciously and lunging at Uncle Evan. He looked at the dog, his eyes narrowing, his face growing serious. “Be careful or we’ll put you in the pan, dog!” he said.

Trigger yelled loudly, leaping boldly towards the taller woman, then quickly backed away, whipping his head back and forth madly.

“We’ll put it in the pan, won’t we, Evan?” Kathryn repeated, placing a large hand on Ivan’s shoulder and holding him back until Ivan winced in pain.

“Mom—” he demanded when his wife finally let go and turned to make her way to the kitchen. “Mom—I’m sorry.”

“It’s just his prank, Evan,” Ms. Ross said with displeasure. “He says it well. really. She’s going to make you a patty.”

“But I don’t want pies!” Evan cried out. “I don’t like it here, I don’t! It hurt me. He squeezed my shoulder harder—”

“Evan, I’m sure she didn’t want to. He wants to play with you. He wants you to love him. Give it a chance—okay?”

Evan started to protest, but restrained himself.

“I’m counting on you.” His mother turned her eyes to the food. They could both see Kathryn at the counter, with her back turned to them, sticking something with a large knife.

“But it’s… amazing!” Evan protested.

“Listen, Evan, I understand how you feel,” her mother said. “But you don’t have to spend all your time with him. There are a lot of kids in this neighborhood. Take Trigger for a walk. I bet you make friends your age. She’s an old lady, Evan. He doesn’t want you to be attached anymore.”

“I guess,” Evans said.

His mother focused in surprise and kissed him and pressed her lips to his. She knew that Smooth had to make her happy. But that only made him feel worse.

“I’m counting on you,” her mother whispered in her ear.

Evan decided to try and be brave about this. “I’ll help you carry the suitcase up to my room,” he said.

They carried him up the narrow stairs. His home was truly a study. The walls were lined with bookshelves filled with old books. There was a large desk in the center of the room. A small bed was made under one of the windows.

The window faced the backyard, a tall green square with a gray car park to the left and a tall wall to the right. A small covered area is located at the back of the dungeon. It was like some sort of dog run.

The smell of the room was rich. The strong smell of butterflies filled Ivan’s nose.

Trigger fell asleep. She rolled onto her back, her legs running through the air.

Evan thought Trigger couldn’t stand this place either. But he kept the thought to himself, and smiled at his mother, who quickly unbuttoned her suitcase and looked anxiously at her watch.

“I am late. I don’t want to miss my flight,” he said. He gave her another kiss, longer this time. He then took a ten-dollar bill out of his pocket and put it in his shirt pocket. “Buy yourself some medicine. Do good. I will be back as soon as I can.”

"I agree. You're going," he said, his heart racing, his voice hard as cotton. The scent of his perfume sent the butterflies away for a moment.

She didn't want him to go. He had such a wicked sense of humor.

"You're just scared," he scolded himself.

“I’ll call you from Atlanta,” he shouted, as he disappeared up the stairs to confront Kathryn.

His Summer is gone.

The spies returned.

Trigger let out a low growl, as if he knew what was going on, as if he knew they were leaving here in this other room, and the old woman froze.

Evan picked up Trigger and kissed his cold black nose. He set the dog down on the old carpet and made his way to the window.

He stood there for a long moment, one hand gripping the curtains to the side as he peered through the tiny hole, trying to feel the cloth tucked against his chest. A few minutes later, he heard his mother’s car coming back up the stone road. Then he heard her leave.

When he couldn't hear any more, he sighed and laid back on the bed. “It’s just you and me now, Trigger,” he said gravely.

Trigger was hiding behind the door.

Evan looked up at the walls of old books.

What am I going to do here all the time? She asked herself, cradling her head in her hands. Not Nintendo. There is no computer. There was no television in his grandmother's small room. What am I going to do?

Sighing again, he picked himself up and walked over the shelves, his eyes scanning the books. He saw a pile of scientific papers and books. books on biology and astronomy, ancient Egyptian, alchemical texts, and medical books. Many of the truffles were filled with yellow paper. Maybe Catherine’s husband, Evan’s great-great-grandfather, was a scientist of sorts.

There’s nothing here for me to read, he thought bitterly.

He opened the bookcase.

"Oh!"

She screamed as if something had snapped out of her.

"Help! Please—help!"

Everything went black.

"Help! I can't see!" cried Evan.

3

Evan shook in fear as the warm darkness washed over him.

It took him a few seconds to realize what it was. Her heart was thundering in her chest, and she reached up and removed the purring black cat from her face.

Cat dropped silently to the ground and approached the door. Evan turned to see Katherine standing there, a smirk on her face.

How long had he stood there? He wondered to himself.

"Sarabeth, how did you get in there?" she asked in a playful tone, leaning in to talk to the cat. “You must have scared the boy.”

The cat purred and touched Catherine's bare feet.

“Does the prize frighten you?” Kathryn asked Evan, still grinning. “This cat has a wicked sense of humor. It's too bad. Pure evil.” He smiled as if he had said something funny.

“I’m fine,” Evan said incredulously.

“Be careful of the salary. It’s bad, “evil is evil.”

Seeing the cat standing in the air, Trigger let out an unhappy growl. His heavy tail went into motion, he jumped at the cat, whooped and screamed, missed, and jumped again, hitting Sarabeth's throat.

“Down, Trigger! Come down!” cried Evan.

Struggling to get out of Catherine's grasp the cat grabbed a black claw at her and hissed in pain and fear. Trigger barked and growled as Evan struggled to pull the excited Cocker Spaniel away.

Evan grabbed Trigger as the cat skidded to the floor and disappeared out the door. “Bad dog. Bad dog,” Evans said. But he really didn't want her. He was glad Trigger had scared the cat away.

He looked up and saw Kathryn filling the doorway and glared at her. “Bring the dog,” he said in a practiced voice, his eyes narrowed and his lips pursed tightly.

“Huh?” Evan pulled Trigger into a passionate kiss.

“Bring the dog,” Catherine repeated coldly. “We can’t tame the animals in this house.”

“But Aunt Kathryn—” Evan started to get depressed, then remembered that he couldn’t hear her.

“Sarabetta is a terrible person,” Katherine said, not moving her face. “Can’t we anger him?” He turned and started down the stairs. “Bring the dog, Evan.”

Grabbing Trigger by the shoulders with both hands, Evan hesitated.

“I need to watch out for the dog,” Katherine said bitterly. "come."

Ivan was suddenly filled with dread. What did he mean, be careful of dogs?

An image came to mind of Catherine standing in the doorway with a bloody kitchen knife in her hand.

“Bring the dog,” Catherine suggested.

Evan sighed. What was he going to do to Trigger?

4

"I'll take care of you, dog," Kathryn repeated, winking at Trigger. The dog howled in response.

“Come on, Evan. Follow me,” he said impatiently.

Seeing he had no choice, Evan carried Trigger down the stairs and followed his aunt outside. “I’m ready,” she said, and he turned to see that she was following.

Despite his age, he was at least eighty—he walked with long, steady strides. “I knew you were bringing the dog, so I tried to arrange it.”

Trigger stroked Evan's hand as they walked through the city and toward the designated distance back. “That’s a special place for your dog,” Katherine said, reaching out and grabbing one end of the leash stretched across the treadmill. Evan, tie this around the neck. Your dog plays here.” She blinked in disapproval of Trigger. “And there won’t be any problems getting paid.”

Evan was very relieved that this was what Katherine wanted from Trigger. But he didn't want to tie Trigger to that prison later in the day. Trigger is a domestic dog. She wouldn’t be happy with herself here.

But Evans knew he had no choice but to fight. Kathryn is smart somehow, she thought hard as she tied the rope around Trigger's collar. Since she won’t read signals and doesn’t read lips, it means she can do whatever she wants and no one can tell her no.

She leaned in and patted Trigger's hot head and glared at the older woman. His arms were crossed in front of his chest, blue eyes gleaming in the sunlight, a cold smile on his face.

“That’s a good boy,” she said, waiting for Evan to wake up before starting to return home. I knew it when I looked at you. Come home, Evan. I have cookies and milk. You celebrate them.” His voice was kind, but his voice was hard and slow.

Trigger let out a happy squeal as Evan followed Kathryn to the house. Evan shifted, trying to go back to comforting the dog. But Kathryn gripped the iron of his hand and her eyes darted forward toward the kitchen door.

The food was small and bland and very hot. Catherine stated and sat down near a small table. The boiler was covered with a plastic sheet. She shrugged, her eyes watching him as he came to her meal.

He downed the pink powdered biscuits and milk and listened to Trigger's screams in the background. Tortoise didn't like it, but he was surprised to learn that he was hungry. While he was eating them, Catherine stood at the door and looked at him intently, her face serious.

He announced:

Katherine sighed and rubbed her face.

Oh. right. He can’t hear me, Evan thought. Standing at the kitchen window, she pointed at Trigger, then made a motion with her fingers. Catherine nodded.

Wu Ah thought. This is going to be tough.

He spat out the voice and hurried to release Trigger from his back prison.

A few minutes later, Trigger was pulling the rope, sadly across the flowers as Evan made his way up the stairs. The other houses on the street had about the same size as Catherine, she saw. And they all had small, neatly arranged front sections.

He saw some children hustling around a beech tree. And he saw a middle-aged man in a bright orange suit washing his car with a garden hose in his driveway. But he never saw any kids his age.

Trigger growled a smirk and took Zoey out of Evan's arms. “Hey —come back!” Evan called. Trigger, unfinished as always, rose from behind the shield.

The squirrel carefully climbed a tree. But Trigger, his eyes never seeing before, continued the chase.

Running as fast as he could, calling the dog’s name, Evan followed him around the corner, down halfway down the street, before Trigger realized he had lost the race.

Breathing heavily, Ivan grasped the rope handle. “Gotcha,” he said. He pulled a rope and tried to resuscitate the dog through Kathryn.

Trigger, circling a black tree, took another path. Evan was about to pick up the dog's head when a hand grabbed his shoulder.

“Hey—who are you?” a voice demanded.

5

Evan turned around to find a girl standing behind him, staring into his red eyes. “Why did you grab my shoulder like that?” she asked, her heart still racing.

“To scare you,” he said simply.

"Yeah. Well…" Evan looked up. Trigger pulled harder on the rope and pulled him.

The girl laughed.

It was good, he thought. She had short black hair and sparkling eyes and a playful smile. He was wearing an oversized yellow t-shirt, a black fanny pack, and bright yellow knickers.

“So who are you?” he asked again.

She wasn’t timid, she decided. “It’s me,” he said, leaving Trigger to lead him around the tree.

“Did you move into Winter’s house?” He asked after her.

She shook her head. "No. I'm just visiting.”

It makes the eyes dazzle.

“Within a few weeks,” Evans added. “I will stay with my brother. Actually, she’s my girlfriend.

“What does he like?” The girl was torn.

“Nothing,” Evan replied without laughing. “Sure.”

Trigger picked a worm on a green leaf.

“Is that your bike?” Ivan asked, pointing at the red bike laying on the grass behind him.

She replied, “Yes.

“It’s great,” he says. “I have the same.”

“I like your dog,” he said, glancing at Trigger. “It’s like a fool. I like silly dogs.

"Me too. I guess." Evan laughed.

“What is his name? Does he have a stupid name?” He focused and tried to go after Trigger, but he missed.

“His name’s Trigger,” Evan said, waiting for her response.

“Yes. That’s ironic," he said thoughtfully. "Especially for a Cocker Spaniel.”

"Thank you," Evan said displeased.

Trigger turned and licked the girl's hands, her tail shaking with anger, her tongue hanging down.

“I have a nickname, too,” the girl admitted. He asked Evans to ask.
“What’s that?” he said at last.

“Andrew,” she said.

“That’s not a stupid name.”

“I hate it,” he said, pulling a stalk of grass out of his shoe. “Andrew.”
He developed a reputation for deep language and knowledge. “It looks like I’m supposed to wear a short flip-flop with white blues and walk around the ballpark. So I make everyone call me Andy.”

"Hi, Andy," Evan said, controlling the trigger. "my name is-"

“Don’t tell me!” He interrupted, pressing a warm hand to his mouth.

He thought he wasn't embarrassed.

“Let me think,” he said. “Is that a weird name too?”

“Yeah.” She shook her head. “It’s Evan. Stupid Evan!

She laughed. “That’s a really silly name.”

She’s glad he made her laugh. He wished he understood. A lot of girls didn’t like his sense of humor. They thought he was an idiot.

"what are you doing?" she asked.

“Travel. You know. Checking out the neighborhood.”

“It’s very disturbing,” he says. “A lot of houses. Want to go downtown? It’s only a few blocks away.” He pointed to the street.

Evan hesitated. He hadn’t told his wife he was going into town. But, guess what. He doesn’t care.

Besides, what can happen?

6

“Okay,” Evans said. “Let’s see the city.”

“I have to go to a toy store and find a present for my nephew,” Andy said, lifting his bike with a conveyor belt.

"how old are you?" Evan asked, pulling Trigger towards the street.

"twelve."

“Me too,” he said. “Can I see your bike?”

She shook her head as she shifted on the hidden chair. “No, but I’ll let you run aside.” She laughed.

“You’re a martyr,” he said sarcastically and hurried over as he began to pick up the paint.

“And you’re an idiot,” he called out playfully.

“Hey, Andrew —pay attention!” He called out to her, repeating her name in a low voice.

A few blocks later, the houses were finished and they went into town, three buildings with shops and offices on the lower two floors. Evans saw a small brick post office, a barber shop with a former barber shop out front, a grocery store, a bank and a grocery store, and a sign advertising a bird’s eye sale.

“The toy store’s in the next building,” Andy said, riding his bike down the aisle. Evan pulled on Trigger’s leash to encourage him to his step. “Actually, there are two toy stores, old and new. I like the old one better.

Evans said, adding:

I wonder if Victor is in love with Katherine Carr, she thought. He quickly dismissed the idea. no way....

The toy store was in an old building that hadn’t been painted in years. A small hand-painted sign in the dust-smeared window read: Wagner’s Novelties & Sundries. There were no toys on display.

Andy parked his bike in front of the house. “Sometimes, the owner can be a little aggressive. I don't know if he lets you bring your dog.”

“Well, let’s see,” Evan said, closing the door. Pulling harder on his leash, Trigger led the way into the store.

Evan found himself in a dark, low-ceilinged room. It took a moment for his eyes to adjust to the dim light.

Wagner’s looks more like a warehouse than a store. There were truffles from the floor to the ceiling on both walls, crammed with toys, and a long counter that stretched across the middle of the store, leaving little room for anyone to even touch i Like Evans, he should have been caught up in it.

At the front of the store sat a man with a bald head, white hair in the middle of a red head, sitting behind a tall tree. She was wearing a white bodysuit and seemed annoyed with Evan and Andy as they entered.

"Hi," Andy said sheepishly, stalking towards the man.

He replied to Kurdistan and read the newspaper he had been reading.

Trigger kissed the low walls passionately. Evan looked around at the toys. It looks like in the thick dust that they’ve been sitting there for centuries. Everything seemed to fit together, there were dolls on the side of the rooms, art pieces mixed in with antiques, and Evan discovered that there was a toy underneath a pile of rugs.

She and Andy are the only customers in the store.

“Do they have Nintendo games?” Evan asked in a whisper, afraid of losing his cool.

“I don’t think so,” Andy replied again. “I’m asking questions.” He yelled stepping forward, “Do you have a Nintendo game?”

It took a moment for the man to respond. He scratched his ear. “Don’t take them,” he croaked at last, sounding solemn about his interruption.

Andy and Evan moved to the back of the store. “Why do you like this place?” Evan whispered and picked up an old bull gun.

"I think it's just fine," Andy replied. “You can find resources here. It’s not like any other toy.”

“That’s true,” Evans said sarcastically. “Hey—look!” He took a small lunch from a well-dressed cowboy nearby. He read “The Hopland Castle.” "Who's Hopalong Cassidy?"

“A young man with a great name,” Andy said, taking the old lunch from his hands and examining it. “Look—it’s made of steel, not paint. I wonder if my cousin likes it. He also likes silly names.

“That’s a lovely gift,” Evans said.

“He’s a great cousin,” Andy said. “Hey look at this.” She put down the old lunch and took a big bite. “It’s magic.

'Impress your friends. Make a hundred amazing tricks,” she read.

“That’s a lot of nuts,” Evans said.

Strolling a long way through the dimly lit store, Trigger led the way, sighing painfully. “Hey—” To Evan’s surprise, a narrow door led into a small back room.

Ivan found the room dark and dusty. Once inside, he saw stuffed animals thrown into cardboard boxes, toys in bright yellow cardboard boxes, and leather-stained and torn baseball gloves.

Who wants that shit? She thought.

He was about to leave when something caught his eye. It was a blue bag, about the size of a bag of soups. He picked it up and was surprised at how heavy it was.

She moved closer to his face and examined it in the dim light, and he read the growing mark: monster blood. Below that, in tiny type, it reads: Miracle Details.

Hey, this looks like fun, he thought, twirling the candle in his hand.

He remembered the ten dollar bill his mother slipped into his shirt pocket.

He turned to see the store owner standing in the doorway, dark eyes wide with anger. “What are you doing here?” she screamed.

7

Trigger let out a shrill cry, startled by the man's rough tone.

Evan grabbed the leash and pulled Trigger closer to him. “Whoa… how much is this?” he asked, grabbing Motor Joel's collar.

The owner said, his voice low and a frown on the rest of his face.

“Huh? It was on the wall here,” Evan explained.

“He’s very old,” the man insisted. “It may not be useful anymore.”

“Fine, I’ll take it anyway,” Evans said. “Can I have her part-time since she’s old?”

“What’s that?” Andy asked, pointing to the door.

“I don’t know,” Evan told her. “It looks great. It’s called Devil’s Blood.”

“It’s not for sale,” the man insisted.

Andy stepped forward, grabbing his shoulder from Ivan's hand. “Oh, I want one too,” he said, rolling his tongue in his hand.

“There’s only one,” Evan told her.

“Are you sure?” He started looking for signs.

“It’s no good, I tell you,” the owner insisted, sounding angry.

"I need one too," Andy told Evan.

“Sorry,” Evan said, taking the bottle back. “I saw it first.”

Andy said, “I’ll buy it from you.

“Why don’t you two leave?” The owner recommended it.

“You mean you’ll sell it to us?” Evan asked hopefully.

The man raised his hand and rubbed his head.

"how much?" Evan asked.

“Are you sure you don’t have anything else to do?” Andy demanded, going back to the truffle, sending a bunch of pandas on his way. “Or two? I could keep some and give some to my cousin.”

“Two dollars, I think,” the man told Evans. “But I tell you, it is not right. He is very old.”

“I don’t care,” Evan reached into his dresser pocket for a ten-dollar bill.

“Well, don’t make me push you,” the man said politely, and pointed to the cash register at the front of the store.

A few minutes later Evan emerged into the sunlight, carrying his blue trumpet. Trigger sighed happily, wagging his curly tail, glad to leave the dusty dark store. Andy followed you out with a happy expression on his face.

“You didn’t buy lunch?” Evan asked.

“Don’t change the subject,” he said in a low voice. “I’ll pay you five dollars for that.” He looked back at the wall of monster blood.

“Not at all,” Evans replied. She laughed. “It’s so nice of you to get your way!”

“I’m an only child,” she said. “What can I tell you? I am ruined.

“Me too,” Evans said.

"I have an idea," Andy pulled his bike out of the wall of the store's entrance. “Let’s share it.”

“Did you destroy it?” Evan shook his head. “Of course. I bet you learned how to ride your bike.”

“You want to ride the bike home? Here." She pressed against him.

“No,” he said, holding it close to her. “I wouldn’t ride your bike now. It’s a girl’s bike, anyway.”

“It’s not,” he insisted. “What about the girl’s bike?”

Ignoring the question, Evan pulled on Trigger’s leash and left the old dog behind and started walking towards his grandfather’s place.

“What about the girl’s bike?” Andy returned, cycling beside her.

“I’m telling you,” Evan said. “Let’s go back to my friend’s house and open the door. I’ll let you mess with it for a while.”

“Gee, Feng,” Andy said sarcastically. “You’re a good boy, Evan.”

“I know,” he said with a smile.

Catherine was sitting in the big chair in the living room when Evan and Andy arrived. Who is she talking to? She wondered, listening to him. He looked like he was happily fighting with someone.

Leading Andy into the house, Evan sees that Sarabetta is the black cat. When Evan entered, the cat turned and left the room.

Catherine looked Evan and Andy straight in the face. “This is Andy,” Evan pointed at his new friend.

“What do you have there?” Kathryn asked, walking over to Andy and returning a handful of the villain's blue blood private parts.

Evans gave it to him instead. Frowning, he spun it around in his hand, pausing to read the sign, moving his lips to read it. He held the plate for a long moment, seeming to study it carefully, and then handed it back to Evan.

Evan grabbed it and repeated it with Andy, hearing Kathryn speak to him in a low whisper. She couldn’t hear him properly. It was like, “Be careful.” But he wasn’t sure.

He turned to see Sarabeth watching him from the doorway, her yellow eyes shining in the dim light.

Evan explained to Andy as they walked up the stairs.

“Does that mean you can say your company whenever you want?” Andy asked.

“I didn’t know that Matrix Katrina didn’t have a journal,” Evans said.

“That’s too bad,” Andy said, walking into Evan’s room, pulling the window blinds, looking down at Trigger, who was twirling sadly in his pen.

“Is she really your girlfriend?” Andy asked. “He doesn’t look very old.”

“It’s black hair,” Evan said, setting the blood pressure reader on the desk in the center of the room. “It makes it feel like a childhood.”

“Hey—look at all these old books for magic!” Andy shouted. “I wonder why you have all this.”

He pulled some of the heavy books out of the old ones and blew some dust from the top. "Maybe your friend wants to come here and cast a spell on you while you sleep, turning you into a new one."

“Maybe,” Evans said, smiling. “What’s Newt anyway?”

Andy raised his hand. “Some kind of tattoo, I guess.” He replaced the yellow pages of the old book. “I thought you said there was nothing here,” he told Evans. “You could read all these wonderful books.”

“Happy and cold,” Evans said sarcastically.

Replacing the book on the wall, Andy came over to the desk and stood next to Ivan, his eyes on the wall of monster blood. Open it. It’s very old. Maybe it’s all confusing and messed up.”

“I certainly hope so,” Evans said. He picked up the canteen and studied it. “Not a joke.”

“Just take a summer off,” he said impatiently.

He grabbed it. He wouldn’t move.

“Maybe you need a pillow or something,” he said.

“It helps a lot,” he said of planning to revisit it. “Look at this. There is no instruction. No components. nothing."

“Of course not. It is the blood of the devil!” he shouted, imitating Count Dracula. She grabbed Evan's neck and pretended to suck on it.

She laughed. "Stop! You're not helping."

He slammed the bottle on the desk – the lid popped off.

“Hey—look!” she screamed.

He cleared his throat and they both stared at the wall.

8

The substance inside the bottle was a bright green color. It shone like Gel-0 in the light from the ceiling.

“Touch it,” Andy said.

But before Evan had a chance, he put a finger inside and pierced it. “It’s cold,” she said. “Touch it. It is really cold.”

Ivan pricked him with his finger. It was cold and heavier than Jell-O.

He tapped his finger on the bottom. When he pulled his finger out, it made a loud noise.

“Gross,” Andy said.

Evan raised his hand. “I’m a villain.”

“I mean it glows in the dark.” Andy hurried over to the light switch near the door. “It’s like glowing green in the dark.”

He had turned off the overhead light, but afternoon light was pouring through the window curtains. “Look at the book,” he instructed cheerfully.

Ivan took the box and went into the box. Andy followed and closed the door. “Yuck. engine,” he cried. “I can’t breathe.”

The monster’s blood glowed in the darkness. A circular green light seemed to be shining from within the bottle.

"Wow. That's awesome," Andy said, pinching his nose to get rid of the strong smell of mustard.

“I’ve got other things that did this,” Evans said, a little relieved. “It was called Alien City or Yuke Globe, something like that.”

“Well, if you don’t want to, I’ll take it,” Andy replied.

“I didn’t say I didn’t want to,” Evans said quickly.

“Let’s get out of here,” Andy demanded.

Evan opened the door and they ran out of the closet, closing the door behind them. They both took a few seconds of pure air.

“Wow, I love that smell!” Evan stated. He looked around and saw that Andy had picked up a handful of bloody mummy from the frame.

She squeezed his hand. “It’s getting colder and colder out here,” he said, smirking at her. "Look. If you touch it, it will fly right away.”

"Yeah. Maybe it’ll fly, too,” said Evan, unconvinced. “Try it on the ground. All those things fly like butterflies.”

Andy rolled the orb of monster blood into a ball and dropped it to the ground. She flew into his arms. He jumped a little harder. This time, he jumped through the wall and flew out of the bedroom door.

“It flies well,” he said, chasing her out of the room. “Let’s see if it lasts.” He grabbed it with both hands and pulled and stretched it into a long rope, “Yes. It’s also late.”

“Big deal,” Evans said. “The stuff I had before also bounced and looked pretty good. I thought this experience was going to be different.”

“She stays cold, even in your hands,” Andy said, going back into the room.

Evan glanced at the wall and saw a round dark ball on the floor.
“O-oh. Look, Andy. That thing sucks.”

“Let’s take it outside and throw it everywhere,” he suggested.

“Fine,” he agreed. “We are going out and about. That way, Trigger won’t be so alone.”

Evan took the herb and Andy swapped out the monster blood ball. They then headed downstairs and out into the backyard, where they were greeted by Trigger who acted like they were twenty years old.

The dog finally calmed down and sat down in the shade of a tree, trying to catch his breath. “Good boy,” Evan said simply. “Relax. Relax, old man.”

Andy reached into the canteen and pulled out a green glove. Then Evans did the same. They twirled the items in their hands until they found a pair of club-shaped balloons. Then they started giving them drinks.

“It’s amazing how they don’t lose their balance,” Andy said, throwing a blue ball up in the air.

Evans shielded his eyes from the bright sun and held the ball with one hand. “All these things are the same,” he said. “It’s not that special.”

“Well, I guess it’s fine,” Andy said defensively.

Evan’s next projection was huge. A green orb rolled over Andy’s outstretched hands.

“Wow!” Andy Castle.

“Sorry,” Evan called.

They both watched the ball fly once, twice, and then land in front of Trigger.

The dog was frightened and jumped to his feet and lowered his nose to cool off.

“No, man!” Evan called. “Leave him alone. Leave it to him, man!”

As if he wasn't as strong as he had been, Trigger lowered his head and watched the green cave glow.

“No, man! drop! Dust!" Evans called out in alarm.

Both she and Andy jumped at the dog.

But they were too slow.

Trigger took the mug of mustard blood with his teeth and began to stir it.

“No, Trigger!” Evan cried out. “Do not swallow it. Don’t wake up!

Trigger swallowed.

“Oh yes!” Andy shouted, pounding his hands at his sides. “Now we don’t have much to plan!”

But that wasn't what bothered Evans. He leaned forward and snapped the dog’s jaws. The green pin was gone. He woke up.

“Stupid dog,” Ivan said softly, releasing the dog’s mouth.

She shook her head as horrible thoughts ran through her mind.

What if those things make Trigger sick? Evan wondered.

Is this thing poisonous?

9

“Are we going to scrap this patch today?” Evans asked his wife, writing the question on a yellow piece of paper she found on the desk in her room.

Kathryn read the question as she adjusted her black bra. His face was as pale as cake flour in the morning sunlight streaming through the kitchen window.

“Pie? What piece?” He responded coldly.

Evan's mouth opened. She decided not to remember.

“Go play with your friends,” Katherine said, coldly tilting Sarabeth’s head as the black cat walked towards the breakfast table. “Why do you want to stay inside with an old witch?”

That was three days later. Evan had tried to make peace with his wife. But the more he tried, the colder he became.

``It's good. Horrible, she thought, as she ate the last morsel from the bowl of chopped rice. That was the only shade he had. Evan would fuss with her every morning. Even with milk, the cereal was too dry and wouldn’t let him add sugar to it.

“It looks like it might rain,” Katherine said, and took a long sip of the tea bag she had prepared for him. His teeth grinding harder and harder as he drank.

Evan rolled his eyes at the bright sunlight outside the window. What made him think it was going to rain?

She rolled her eyes and sat down at the small kitchen table. For the first time, he noticed the paint on his tongue. It was cream colored and looked like clay.

Bones, Evan confirmed.

He looked closely, trying to decide if it was a real bone, perhaps from an animal, or a bone carved out of wax. Catching his eye, Katherine reached back with one of her large hands and tucked the citizen into her jacket.

“Go see your girlfriend. He’s a good guy,” Katherine said. She took another long sip of tea and clenched her teeth as she swallowed.

Yes. I need to get out of here, Evan thought. He pushed his chair back, standing up and taking his plate to the sink.

I can't take much more of this, Evan thought grimly. She hates me. He really does.

She hurried up the stairs to her room, where she brushed her curly red hair. She looked in the mirror and thought back to the call from her mother the night before.

He called right after dinner, and she could tell by his voice now that things were not going well in Atlanta.

“How’s it going, Mom?” he had asked, sounding happy to hear her, even though he was a thousand miles away.

“A little bit,” his mother had answered hesitantly.

"What do you mean? How's Dad? Have you found a room yet?" The questions were like the wind coming out of a balloon.

“Wow. Get to know yourself,” Ms. Ross said. She looked exhausted. “We’re both good, but it’s going to take a little longer to find a home than we thought. We didn't find anything we liked.”

“Does that mean—” Evan began.

“We found a really nice house, very big and very beautiful,” her mother concluded. “But the school you go to wasn’t very good.”

“Oh, that’s good. I’m not going to school,” Evans joked.

He could hear his father murmuring in the background. Her mother turned off the device to answer.

“When are you coming to pick me up?” Evan asked hopefully.

Her mother took a moment to respond. “Well… that’s the problem,” he said finally. “Maybe we need a little bit more down here than we think. How's it going there, Evan? Are you okay?”

Hearing the bad news that he would have to stay with Katherine for a longer period of time made Evan want to scream and hit the wall. But he didn’t want to anger his mother. She told him she was fine and that she had made a new friend.

His father picked up the phone and spoke some hopeful words. “Put yourself out there,” he had said before ending the conversation.

I’m getting closer, Evan thought wryly.

But hearing her parents’ voices made her feel homesick even more.

The next morning. She let her hair down and took a quick glance at herself in the mirror. He was wearing shorts and a red Gap T-shirt.

Downstairs, he hurried past the kitchen, where Catherine and Sarabetta were apparently fighting, ran out the back door, and then ran through the back door.

trigger. “Hey Trigger!”

But the dog was sleeping, lying next to him mid-run, sniffling softly.

“Don’t you want to go to Andy’s house?” Ivan asked quietly.

Trigger shuddered, but didn't open his eyes.

"Agreed. See you later," Evan said. Making sure Trigger's water bottle was full then he headed to the front of the house.

He was halfway down the street, walking slowly, thinking of his parents far away in Atlanta, when a man’s voice called out, “Hey—you!” and the two boys stepped to the side of the road in front of him, blocking the way.

Ivan was startled, and he looked from one man to the other. They were twins. Identical twins. They were both big guys with short white hair and red cheeks. Both were wearing black sweatshirts with heavy name tags on the front, short backpacks, and high-heeled shoes without socks. Evan guessed there were fourteen or fifteen of them.

"who are you?" One of them asked seriously, narrowing his eyes, trying to be mean. Both twins got close, forcing Evans to take a big step backwards.

These guys are twice the size of me, Evan realized, feeling a sense of dread.

Are they just doing bad things? Or do they really want to give me trouble?

“I—I’m staying with my wife,” he stopped, stuffed his hands into his pockets and took another step back.

The twins looked at each other quickly. “You can’t walk on the left,” one of them shouted, jumping on Evans.

"Yeah. You're not a resident," another added.

“That’s a big point,” Evans said, then wished he hadn’t said it.

Why can’t I ever close my mouth? he asked himself. His eyes scanned the neighborhood, looking for someone who might come to his aid in case the twins tried to hurt him.

But there was no one there. The front doors were closed. The places are empty. Down the hall, she could see a letter headed the other way, too far away to yell at.

There’s no one around. No one will help him.

And the two boys, their faces closed, their eyes frightened, started to advance.

10

“Where do you think you’re going?” one of the twins asked. His hands were clasped at his side. He moved closer until he was only a step or two away from Ivan, which forced Ivan to take a few steps back.

“To see a friend,” Evan replied uncertainly. Maybe these guys were just gunslinging.

“No need,” the twin said quickly, smirking at his brother.

They both laughed and moved towards Evan, forcing him back out of the way and onto the street.

“You’re not a resident,” one repeated. He narrowed his eyes, trying to stare intently.

“Hey, give me a break, guys,” Evans said. He tried to step aside and walk down the street to avoid them. But they both moved to avoid it.

“Maybe you can pay some money,” one of them said.

“Yes,” said the other quickly, “you can pay non-residents. You know, to temporarily get permission to walk on the right hand side.”

“I don’t have any money,” Evans said, growing panicked.

He suddenly remembered he had eight dollars in his pocket. Were they going to take it? Will they beat him and then make him run?

“You have to pay,” one of them said, pointing at him. “Let’s just see what you got.”

They both quickly went up and grabbed it for him.

He turned away. His legs suddenly became heavy with fear.

Suddenly a voice shouted from the street. “Hey—what’s going on?”

Evan looked up past the two boys to see Andy's speed
rode towards them on his bike down the street. “Evan—wow!” he called.

The twins turned to Evan to greet the newcomer. “Thank you, Andy,” one of them said in a sarcastic tone.

“How’s it going, Andy?” the other asked, imitating his brother.

Andy braked his bike and dropped both feet to the ground. She was wearing a bright pink short and a yellow sleeveless shirt. His face was red and his forehead was sweaty from riding.

“You two,” he said and made an unpleasant face. “Rick and Tony.” He turned to Evan. “Were they on your case?”

“Well…” Evan began hesitantly.

The victim, whose name was Rick, told his brother he was welcoming him to the neighborhood.

Tony started to add something, but Andy interrupted. “Okay, leave it.”

“Are you his mother?” Tony asked, smirking. He turned to Ivan and made baby noises.

“We’ll leave him alone,” Rick said, turning to Andy. “We’ll borrow your bike and leave it alone.”

"Not at all," Andy said erroneously.

But before Andy could move, Rick grabbed the baton. “Go on!” Andy yelled, trying to get the bike out of his hands.

Rick held it tight. Tony hit Andy hard.

He slipped out of his trance and fell, the bike falling on him.

“Oh.”

Andy let out a small cry as she ran to the side of the street. He was lying on the road with his arms crossed, Papa's bicycle on top of him.

Before he could get up, Tony reached out and grabbed the bike. He swung his legs over the chair and started pacing furiously. “Stop!” His brother called, laughing and running to his side.

Within seconds, the twins had disappeared on Andy's bike.

“Andy—are you okay?” Evan screamed and hurried down the hallway. “Are you okay?”

He took Andy's hand and sat him on his feet. He stood up and rubbed the back of his head. “I hate these guys,” he said. He wiped dirt and grime off his shorts and legs. “Oh. That hurts.”

“Who are they?” Evan asked.

“The Beam Twins,” he replied, scrunching up his face. “Real heavyweight guys,” he added with a chuckle. He looked at his leg to see if it was cut. It was just wiped out. “They think they’re good, but they’re real.”

“How about your bike? Should we call the police or something?” Evan asked.

“No need,” she said softly, smoothing down her dark hair. “I always get it. They’ve done this before. They leave it somewhere when they run out.”

“But we shouldn’t—” Evan began.

“They just run wild,” Andy interrupted. “No one at home was there to look after them. They live with their grandmother, but she is never there. Did they give you any trouble?”

Evan shook his head. “I was afraid I was going to hit them,” he joked.

Andy didn't laugh. “I want to beat them,” he said angrily. “Just once. I want to pay them back. They pick up all the kids in the neighborhood. They think they can do anything because they are great and because there are only two of them.”

“Your knee is broken,” Evan pointed out.

“I better go home and clean it up,” he replied, rubbing his eyes in disgust. “See you later, okay? I have to go somewhere this afternoon, but maybe tomorrow we can do something.”

He headed for his room, a scratch on the back of his head.

Evan went back to Catherine's, walking slowly, thinking about the Beam twins, hesitating to fight them, imagining them being beaten to a pulp in a fight, and Andy watching, nodding.

Kathryn was on the floor in the front of the room when Evan entered. He didn’t look up. He quickly headed into his room.

Now, what do I do? He wondered, walking back and forth. The villain’s bloody blue vessel caught his eye. He walked to the front desk and took the bus to the center aisle.

He removed the cover. The bucket was getting full.

I guess Trigger didn’t eat that much, and he thought it was a bit bland.

trigger!

She forgot all about him. The poor dog should starve.

Dropping the carcass to the floor, Ivan descended the ladder and leaned against the wall, taking the steps three at a time. Then, running completely wild, he flew to the dog run behind the duke.

"Wake up! Hey—trigger!” he called.

After about halfway through, Evan noticed that something was wrong.

Trigger's eyes were wide. His mouth was hanging open, his tongue darting from side to side, and white stubble streamed down his chin hair and onto the floor.

"trigger!"

The dog was gasping for breath, and every breath was a desperate, violent struggle.

It’s getting confusing! Evan understood.

By the time Evan reached the dog run, Trigger's eyes rolled back, the dog's paws collapsed underneath him, his stomach tightening and the air filled with his ragged breathing.

11

“True—no!”

Evan knelt down next to the dog and started at Trigger’s shoulder.
Evan felt his throat tighten even more.

The dog’s chest rose. White smoke poured out of the open mouth.

“Shut up, man. Stop!" Evan yelled.

The wolf's eyes were rolling in his head. It's like he didn't see or hear it.
Evan.

“Hold on, man! Just drink it!”

Cole wouldn't move. He was buried under the fur of the dog.

Hands trembling, Evan struggled to pull the collar over Trigger’s head.

Let go, let go, he pleaded.

Yes!

Trigger let out a yell of pain as Evan managed to get the collar off of him.

“The truck—it’s gone! Are you okay?”

The dog immediately jumped to his feet. He licked Evan's face gratefully, covering Evan's eyes with his hard elbow, and moaned as he realized that Evan had just saved his life.

“Easy, man! Easy man!” Evan repeated, but the dog continued to sniff appreciatively.

Evan hugged the happy dog. This was a close call, he knew. If only he hadn’t come back then…

Well, he didn't want to think about it.

When Trigger finally sat down, Evan looked at Cole. “What makes this island so low as a man?” he asked Trigger.

The dog was walking along the fence and drinking water from his bowl.

This is strange, Evan thought. The column could not be lowered. Made of leather. There’s no reason for it to be any less.

So why did he start approaching the train?

Evan turned to Trigger and studied him as the dog gulped down the water eagerly, breathing heavily. She turned and stared at Ivan for a second, then went back to drinking her water.

It’s big, Evan decided.

It’s big now.

But Trigger was only twelve years old, a thirty-four-year-old human. Formerly Aunt Katherine.

Trigger was too old for extended development.

It must be my eyes, Ivan decided, tossing his collar to the floor. This place should keep me in check.

Catherine was in the kitchen, inviting Evan to lunch. She dropped a bite of dry food and yelled out loud to Trigger, who didn't look up from the water bottle and hurried home.

The next morning, crisp morning and autumnal chill in the air, Evan made his way to Andy’s house. He found her smoking under a large tree in her neighbor’s backyard. “What’s going on?” he called.

Then she saw him leaning over something, his hands working quickly. “Help me!” he cried, not looking up.

Evan came running. “Wow!” He yelled as he saw Andy struggling to free a cat tied to a tree trunk.

The cat growled and dragged Andy's paw. Andy avoided the nails and continued to pull the strings.

“The Beam twins did this. I know,” he said over the cat’s meow. “This poor cat may have been stuck in here all night.”

The cat was terrified and screamed in a strangely human voice.

“Stop everywhere cat,” Evan said as the panicked cat dragged his claws at Andy again. “Can I help?”

"No. I’ll be right back,” he replied, shrugging. “I’d like to tie Rick and Tony to this tree.”

“Poor scared kitten,” Evans said softly.

"There," Andy said triumphantly, pulling out the leash.

The cat gave one last yelp, his tail standing up. Then he ran as fast as he could and disappeared down the side of a tall hill and looked behind him.

“It’s not very big,” Evans said.

Andy woke up excited. He was wearing clean jeans and a green T-shirt that fell to his knees. He lifted the bottom of his shirt and examined a hole that the cat had managed to claw through.

“I can’t believe those two guys,” he said, shaking his head.

“Maybe we should call the police or the ASPCA or something,” Evans advised.

“The twins just lived off of it,” Andy said, shaking his head and nodding. Then he added, "And a cat is not a very good witness."

They both laughed.

Evan led the way to his friend’s house. Along the way, they talked about how they wanted to teach the Beam twins a lesson. But neither of them had a good idea.

They saw Catherine focusing on a puzzle on the dining room table.

He looked up when they entered and glared at them. “You like the band? I like to concentrate, you know. That’s why I love pizza. Your mind might be fuzzy when you get to my age. One hundred and twelve.”

He pounded the table excitedly of his own accord. Both Evan and Andy showed good smiles. He then went back to his test without waiting for a response.

“He’s going to run me nuts!” Evan cried out.

“Evan—he’s listening to you!” Andy decided, pressing a hand to his mouth.

“I told you, he was a complete idiot. She can’t hear me. She doesn’t want to hear from anyone. He teaches everyone.”

“I think it’s great,” Andy said. “Why does he wear a bone in his mouth?”

“He probably thinks he’s good,” Evans said.

“Let’s go upstairs.” Andy asked going upstairs. "I still find it hard to talk about your uncle in front of him."

“You’re a crazy old man,” Evan called Katherine, a big smile on his face.

Katherine looked up from her puzzle pieces to stare coldly in his direction.

“Heard you!” Andy cried, horrified.

“Don’t,” you said, and he started to crawl towards the stairs.

In Evan’s room, Andy walked awkwardly. “What do you want to do?”

“Well… we could read some of these great books,” Evans said teasingly, pointing to the antique books that lined the walls. “Maybe you’ll find a screen that involves the Boom twins. You know. Turn them into coins.”

“Forget Newt,” Andy said dryly. “Hey—where’s Manblood?” Before Evan could answer, he saw her against a wall.

They ran through the room because of it. Andy got there first and grabbed the camp.
“Evan—look,” she said, her eyes wide with surprise. “What’s going on?”

He grabbed the bar. The green gangster had pushed the door open and was running out of the cage.

12

“Huh? Did space explode or something?” Evan asked.

He took the plate from her hand and examined it. Of course the cover was off. A thick green substance was billowing out of the bottle.

Evan pulled out a handful of green gloves. “It’s amazing,” he exclaimed. “It’s growing,” he said, holding it in his hand. “It’s growing now.”

“I think so!” Andy shouted. “It just grew out of the walls!”

“Hey—it’s not cold anymore,” Evans said. He picked it up and threw it at Andy.

“It’s really hot,” he admitted. "weird!"

He tried to throw it at her, but it clung to his hand. “It’s getting sticky,” he continued. “Are you sure this is the same thing?”

“Of course,” Evans replied.

“But it wasn’t easy before, remember?” she said.

He pulled another earring out of the frame. “I think he’ll just slip out after I open the door.”

He curled the thing into a ball and threw it to the ground. “Look—it’s stuck on the floor. It didn’t fly.”

"weird!" Andy sat down.

“Maybe I should throw it in the trash,” Evan said, pulling the sticky ball off the floor. “I mean, what good is it if it doesn’t fly?”

“Hey—no way,” Andy said. “We’ll have to see what he does next.”

A murmur made them both turn towards the door.

Evan was surprised to see Sarabette standing there with her head held back and her yellow eyes watching him.

Or was he staring at the orb of monster blood in his hand?

“This cat looks smart,” Andy said.

"He's as stupid as any other cat," Evan said, "Look. He wants to see the ball and the human blood."

“Sorry cat,” Andy said. “It doesn’t fly.”

As if he understood, Sarabeth squealed happily, turned, and silently left the room.

“Now where do I keep this stuff?” Evan asked. “It’s too big for his box.”

"Here. How about this?" Andy asked, reaching over to a low table and bringing out an empty coffee pot.

"Yes. I agree." Evan threw his butt into the coffee pot.

Andy reached over and touched the pancake. “Look. It’s not as shiny as it used to be either,” she said, holding up her pancake for Evan to see. “But it’s warm. It’s getting warmer.”

“It's alivel,” Evan shouted playfully. “Run for your lives! It’s A/SW!”

Andy laughed and started asking Evan not to scare him with the green pancake. “Come on, get your bloody match! Come and get it!”

He pulled away and took her in his arms. Crushing it together with one hand, he threw it into the coffee mug.

They both looked into the canal. The green substance filled it about halfway.

“To Taga. Taste her,” Andy encouraged, shoving his member in her face. “I care.”

“Huh? no way. I double-dare you,” Evan said, pouring her a cup of coffee.

“Double-darers need to go first,” Andy insisted, smiling. "To Taga. Cool down.”

Evan frowned and shook his head. He then grabbed a large fork and handed it to Andy. He laughed as he picked it up on the carpet and threw it in his face. He threw up, and the green globe stuck to the wall.

Ivan waved his hand for another moment.

They had a fierce, hilarious fight until dinner time. Then, as they try to stand down, they both hear Trinity through the open window. She was crying into his hand.

Evan reached the window first. The sky was overcast and gray. Trigger was leaning against the oak tree, standing on his hind legs and turning his head.

“Whoa, Trigger,” Evan called, “relax!”

“Hey—what’s wrong with Trigger?” Andy asked. “Is your dog growing? It looks so great!”

Evan's mouth dropped open and he let out a sigh as he realized Andy was right.

Trigger was pulled twice.

13

“Tri—come back! Come back”

The big dog kept running, its paws bouncing on the gravel.

“Don’t come back!” Ivan screamed, running in long strides, his heart pounding, his legs aching with each step, trying to catch up to the fleeing dog.

The night was dark and there were no stars. The street was shiny as if it had recently rained.

Trigger's feet ran across the pavement, each step a loud thunderstorm that seemed to grow louder and louder. His huge ears fluttered like wings, and the twins were caught in the wind. His big head bobbed up and down, but he didn’t look behind him.

"Wake up! Wake up!"

Ivan’s voice seemed muffled by the cold wind and snapped back in his face. She tried to scream louder, but no sound came out.

He knew he had to stop the dog from escaping. He should have caught the dog and called for help.

Trigger was growing so fast he could barely contain it. He was already a pony and he was growing bigger by the minute.

"Wake up! Wake up! Stop, boy!”

Trigger didn’t seem to hear him. Ivan’s voice didn’t seem to get louder than the rustling, swirling wind.

And still Evan ran, his chest pounding, every muscle aching. And as he ran, he realized other people were running too.

Two large figures stand in front of the leaping dog.

Evan recognized two large figures as they ran as fast as they could, dodging the fleeing animal.

The twins in Beemer. Rick and Tony.

Trigger was chasing after them and Ivan suddenly understood.

The boys turned down a tunnel and headed down a darker alley. Trigger followed behind them. Evan kept running, pulling off the back of this heavy parade.

It’s all silent now except for the steady thunder of Trigger’s big wings and the music.

Except for the clacking of the Beymer twins’ boots as they jogged down the shiny street.

Except for Evan’s breathing, as he struggled to keep up.

Surprisingly, Ivan looked at him in horror as the dog got up on its hind legs. She tilted her head upwards and let out an ear-shattering scream. Not the howling of a dog. A creature screams. And then, Trigger’s circumstances began to change. His forehead shot forward and expanded. His eyes grew big and wild before they narrowed beneath his eyelids. Teeth rose from its open mouth, and another scream erupted into the sky, louder and colder than the first.

“He’s a monster! A monster!” cried Evan.

And get up.

He woke up from his nightmare.

And she realized she was in bed in Katherine's upstairs classroom.

It was all a dream, a nightmare, a desperate chase of a dream.

Non-harmful meat. Except something still wasn’t right.

Guide. It wasn’t perfect. It’s very stressful.

Evan sat up, attentive, awake now.

And he looked at her big feet. His big hands. And he realized that the bed beside him was soft.

Because he was an adult now.

Because it was getting too big, too big.

When she saw how big it was, she opened her mouth wide and cried.

14

Her screams woke him up.

This time he really woke up.

And she realized that, for the first time, she had only dreamed that she was awake.
He only dreamed of becoming an adult.

Dreams upon dreams.

Was he awake now?

He sat up, closed his eyes, and became tired of concentrating.

The vest is cooked.

His briefs were thrown to the ground.

Her panties were damp and clinging to his skin.

Nothing looked familiar. It took him a moment to shake off the meat to remember where he was. that he was in his room in Katrina. Get up now. His perfect size.

The wind blew, the curtains pulled in, and then they left the window with a bang.

Evan sat up and, shakily, looked out the window.

Gray clouds drifted over the white half moon. The trees creaked and whispered in the cool night air.

It’s just a dream.

A nightmare. A dream upon a dream.

He could see Trigger sleeping, curled up on himself, and pressed against the wall.

Trigger is not evil. But it was definitely big, Evan could see.

Maybe there’s something to it. A dangerous thought made its way through Evan's mind as he looked at the sleeping dog.

Maybe it’s gas or something.

He may be eating too much. Or maybe…

Evan sighed. She realized she was too sleepy to think clearly. Maybe the next morning she’d know if there was a vet in town.

She started to sit on the bed. But something caught his eye.

There is a coffee cup in the library. Where he treasured the blood of the devil.

“Hey—” he groaned loudly.

A green hump was bubbling and trembling above the coffee mug.

15

“Your dog seems healthy for his age.” Dr. Forrest gently tapped Trigger under his chin. “Look at all the white hair,” he said, lowering his face to the dog’s. “Are you a good old dog?”

Trigger patted the doctor's hand gratefully.

Dr. Forrest smiled, pressing his black glasses over his constricted nose, the skylight glinting off his shiny forehead. He wiped his hand on the front of his white lab coat.

Evan and Andy stood in front of Trigger in the small, brightly lit office. Both were nervous during the lengthy examination the veterinarian performed on the dog. But now that they heard the doctor’s words, their faces turned pale.

“So you think it’s just a long shot?” Evan repeated.

Dr. Ford shook his head and returned to his desk in the corner. “Highly unusual,” he said softly and leaned over the desk to jot down a note on a piece of paper. “It’s a very interesting thing. We will get the lab report back within three to four days. It can tell us a lot. But the dog seems healthy to me. I really don’t mind.”

“But do cocker spaniels get this honorable?” Evan asked, bending down to scratch Trigger under his chin, the leash still loose in his hand.

Trigger wanted to leave. He pulled her towards the door. Evan stood up and pulled harder on the leash, keeping the dog in place. He took his strength. Trigger wasn’t just firing; Stronger than a few days ago.

“No. Probably not,” Bengal replied. “That’s why I took the hormone tests and took the blood and glucose tests. Maybe the lab will have the answer for us.”

He finished writing and added the document to the pad. “Here,” he said, handing the book to Evan. “I registered a good dog. Put the trigger on this one and watch her cut back on her food intake. “He laughed at his own joke.

Evan thanked the doctor and allowed Trigger to leave the office. Andy ran after them. Outside in the waiting room, a miniature Chihuahua got behind a couch, purred and blushed at the sight of the redhead.

“I’m glad I got out there,” Evans said as they pulled off to the side of the road.

"Trigger got a good report," Andy said worriedly, rubbing Trigger's head. “Hey, look—his head is bigger than my hand!”

“It can be as big as a sheepdog!” Evan said sternly. “And Dr. Forrest says it’s fine.”

“Don’t misunderstand,” Andy scolded. He looked at his watch. “Oh, yes! I don’t believe that. I’m behind in my piano lessons. further! Mommy’s going to kill me!”

He waved her back, turned, and ran at full speed down the street as he nearly collided with an elderly couple exiting the small grocery store around the corner.

“Let’s go, boy,” Evan said, thinking of what Dr. Ford said. Grabbing the rope, he stepped out of the small three-story town. Despite the vet’s wishes, Evan was very concerned about Trigger.

He stood outside the barn. “Maybe an ice cream popcorn will help cheer me up.” He tied Trigger’s leash to the red fire hydrant at the feed door. “Stay,” he advised.

Trigger let go of Evan and he struggled to pull himself free.

“I’ll be the only second,” Evan said, and hurried into the store.

There were three or four people in the store and it took longer than Ivan had expected. When he returned to the driveway ten minutes later, he saw the Beymer twins busily pulling the trigger.

“Hey—you’re going!” He cried out in anger.

They both turned to him with the same smiles on their rough faces. “Look what we found,” one of them sneered. The other successfully removed the rope from the valve.

“That’ll do it for me,” Ivan insisted, holding his chocolate icing in one hand and the rope handle in the other.

The Beymer twins grabbed Evan by the hand of the rope — and then quickly yanked it out of his hands. “Gocha!”

The brothers laughed merrily and slapped each other.

“Keep cheating,” Evans insisted. “Give me Zero.”

“Searchers, arrestees,” one of them said. “Isn’t that fair, Tony?”

“Yeah,” Tony said, smiling. “He is a vicious dog. But he is our bad dog now.”

“Get your own dog, Wappy,” Rick said sternly. He reached over and took the ice cream from Evan's hand. It fell to the side of the road with a splash.

The brothers started laughing, but their laughter was interrupted when Trigger let out a warning, warning cry. He pulled back his lip and bared his teeth.

“Hey—” Rick shouted, dropping the rope.

With a loud and angry growl, Trigger stood up and jumped on Rick, forcing him backwards into the hallway.

Tony had already started running, his shoes hitting the pavement as he gained great speed, past the post office and on.

“Stop! Hey, Tony, wait! Rick pushed himself up and took off after his brother.

Evan caught Trigger’s rope—and it snapped.

“Tri—wow! stop!"

The wolf took off after the runaway twins, growling angrily as his big paws jumped on the carpet, picking up speed and closing in on them.

No, Evan thought, finding himself frozen there on the corner in front of the grocery store.

No, no, no.

This can’t be happening!

It’s my dream.

Will it be true?

Evan shuddered, remembering the rest of his dream, remembering how he too had grown to twice his size.

Will that dream part come true too?

16

That afternoon, about an hour before dinner, Evan called Andy. “Can I come?” she asked. “I have a little problem.”

“It’s like a big problem,” Andy said.

"Yeah. I agree. Very difficult,” Evan finished impatiently. “I’m not in the mood to play around, okay?”

"Agreed. I'm sorry, Andy replied quickly. “Any sign of Rick and Tony? They're not your problem, are they?"

“Right now,” he said to her. “I told you, they were leaving when I grabbed the train. She has disappeared. She has disappeared. Trigger was still shaking his head. I dragged him home and put him in his pen.

“So what’s your problem?” she asked.

“I cannot tell you. I have to show you,” he said. “I’ll be there now. bye."

She hung up the phone and hurried down the stairs, grabbing the mail. Catherine was in the kitchen behind him, cutting something with her large butcher knife. Evan hurried through and out the door. Andy’s house was a modern ranch, redwood style, with a low hedge running up the front. She said her father was a big weed lover. It was cut about an inch and a half above the ground, and was as smooth as a carpet. In front of the house was a flower garden, with tall orange and yellow vines fluttering in the gentle breeze.

The front door was locked. Evan banged on the screen door.

“What’s in the leaves?” Andy greeted as he let himself inside.

“Look,” he said, breathless as he ran all the way home. He grabbed the plate he had taken from Katherine's car door.

"Oh, wow," Andy said, holding up her hands and looking at his face searchingly.

“Yeah. Whoa,” he swallowed sarcastically. “Devil’s blood. It’s ripe again. Look. It’s almost filling that big bottle. What are we going to do?”

“What do you want to tell us?” Andy smiled as he led her into the tub.

“Not funny,” he muttered.

“You didn’t want to share it,” he stressed.

“I’m looking forward to it now,” he said cheerfully. “Really… do you want to? I’ll give it to you at a reasonable price—free.” He held the bag to his side.

“H-huh.” Andy shook his head and crossed his arms in front of his chest. “Put it down, will you?” He glanced behind the red leather couch in the corner. “Leave him there. That makes me happy.”

“Give you shit!?” cried Evan. “What am I going to do? Every time I turned around, it got bigger. He’s growing faster than Trigger!”

"Hey!" They both shouted at once.

They both had the same thoughts, the same terrifying thoughts. They both remembered that Trigger had eaten a piece of green gank.

“Do you think…” Evan began.

“Maybe…” Andy replied, not even thinking about finishing his thought. "Maybe Trigger is growing because he ate monster blood."

“What am I going to do?” Ivan shouted, pacing frantically around the room and shoving his hands into his jeans pockets. “Things just keep getting worse and worse, and poor Trigger. I'm the only one here. There is no one who can help me. No one.”

“How’s your girlfriend?” Andy suggested, glancing at the ground in the corner. “Maybe Catherine can think of something—”

“Are you kidding? She can’t hear me. He doesn't want to listen to me. She hates me. He’d sit with his puzzle and argue with that mean black cat all day.”

"Agreed. Forget the ball," Andy said, face down.

“Maybe if you tell Dr. Ford—”

“Oh yeah. “Sure,” Evan said. “He really believed that Trigger would turn into a giant because I let him eat monster blood.”

He threw himself on the corner. “I am here alone, India. No one is helping me. I can’t talk to anyone about this.”

“Except me?”

“Yes,” she said, locking her eyes with his. “Except you.”

He sank down on one of the other sofas. “Well, what can I do?” She asked hesitantly.

He jumped up and picked up the bag. “Take one of these. Let’s share it.”

“Huh? Why don’t we just throw it in the trash?” he asked looking at her. A green wing was flying near the northern sky.

“Throw it? We can’t,” he said.

“Of course we can. come on. I will show you.” She reached for his hand and took it, but he let it go.

“What if it’s going through the garbage can?” she asked. “What if it’s just growing?”

Andy raised his hand. "I don’t know."

“And I need to save him,” Evan continued cheerfully. “If it is indeed something that involves the trout, I need it as evidence. You know. To show the doctors or whatever. Then they can treat Trigger.”

"Maybe we should call the cops," Andy said thoughtfully, tugging on a strand of his hair.

"Yes. Please," Evan replied, rolling his eyes. "They really believe us. Now. 'We bought this thing at a toy store, police, and now it's growing and turning my dog ​​into Be a big dog.'"

“It’s alright, alright. You were right.” Andy said. “We can’t call the police.”

“So you’ll help me?” Evan asked. “Do you carry any of these things?”

"I guess," he said into his shoes. “But just a little.” He got to his feet and looked around the floor. “I’ll be right back.”

He left the room, then quickly returned with an empty coffee pot in his hand. "Fill 'er up," he said, smiling.

Evan looked at the coffee pot. “That’s all you got?” She decided. Then he heard her voice soften. "I agree. I agree. It's helpful."

Andy nodded and poured the coffee in the middle of the kitchen garden. "Hey!" she screamed. Her arms flew out and she fell to the ground.

“What’s wrong?” Evan hurried over to her.

“He was pouring a can of coffee,” she said, her face full of fear and surprise. “Suck it. see."

Evan looked into the pipe. The coffee can had disappeared underground. “Huh?”

"I could imagine him pulling out," Andy said with a shudder. He found his seat on the floor.

“Let’s see,” Evan said, sticking both fingers into the center of the opponent’s blood.

“Yuck,” Andy said. “This is really serious.”

“It’s going on. You were right,” Evan agreed. “It’s like he’s pulling my hands down. Wow. It’s too hot. Like he’s alive.”

“Don't say that! cried Andy with a shudder. “Just get the bucket out, okay?”

Evan had to pull hard, but he managed to pull the coffee tube, filling the top with the quivering green stuff. “Yuck.”

“Are you sure I should take this?” Andy asked, not holding it, even as he held it out to him.

“For a little while,” he said. "Until we can think of a better plan."

"Maybe we can feed it to the Beymer twins," Andy suggested, finally picking up the trumpet.

“So we’ll have the giant twin Beams,” Evans joked. “No, thank you.”

"Seriously, you better watch out for them," Andy warned. “If Trigger scared them this morning, they’re going to try to get back at you. They think they’re tough guys, Evan. They can be dangerous. They can really hurt you.”

"Thank you for encouraging me," Ivan said stubbornly. He would scoop small clumps of dragon blood in his hands and toss them into the pot.

“I was watching a video before you came. The first Indian Jones movie. Do you want to try it?”

Evan shook his head. "No. I'd better get going. When I left, Auntie Katherine was busy making dinner. Cutting up some kind of meat. Another nice dinner, sitting there watching Katherine and her cat."

"Poor Evan," Andy said, half smiling, half sympathetic.

He picked up the bowl, now only three of which were full, as he carried it to the front door. “Call me later, okay?” she asked.

She nodded and went outside. He closed the door behind him.

He was halfway there when the Beam twins emerged from behind another toilet, their arms curling into red balls.

17

The brothers came out of the well. Their short hair caught the afternoon light. They were both smiling happily.

Evan stood still, looking from one to the other.

No one said a word.

A Beymer grabbed the trumpet from Evans and threw it to the ground. The trumpet blew with a resounding thud, its thick green contents spilling out onto the grass, making harsh sucking sounds.

“Hey—” Ivan shouted, breaking the heavy silence.

He couldn’t say much.

The other twin kicked him hard in the stomach.

Evan felt the pain in his body. Pansy exhaled. He gasped for air.

He didn’t see another punch. He fell on his face, his right eye on the ground.

He cried out in pain, waving his hands in the air helplessly.

Both brothers were now beating him. Then one of them hit Ivan hard on the shoulder and sprawled him out on the cold, damp grass.

Pain flooded his body, followed by a wave of vomiting. He closed his eyes and took a deep breath, waiting for the sharp pain in his stomach.

It felt like the earth was spinning. He reached out and grabbed her and held her up so she wouldn't fall.

By the time she managed to lift her head Andy was standing over her, his eyes wide with concern. “Evan—”

He groaned and waved both his arms as he tried to sit up. Dizziness, weed poisoning forced him to die.

“Are they gone?” He asked, closing his eyes and getting rid of the dizziness.
“Rick and Tony? I chased them away,” Andy said, kneeling beside her.
“Are you okay? Should I call my mom?”

He opened his eyes. "Yeah. No, I don't."

"what happened ?" he asked her.

He raised a hand to his eyes. “Oh!” It was swollen, too painful to touch.

“They beat you?”

“Either that or I got hit by a truck,” he cried.

After a few minutes—it felt like hours—he was back on his feet, breathing normally, rubbing his puffy cheeks. “I’ve never been in a fight before,” he shook his head at Andy. "never."

“It doesn’t look like much of a fight,” he said, his face still worried about the situation.

She started to laugh, but it made her stomach hurt.

“We’ll pay them,” Andy said sternly. “We will find a way to pay them back. efforts.”

"El. Look. Blood of the monster. Evan hurried over to her.

The bottom was lying next to him. The green cones flowed across the grass, forming a wide, straight valley.

“I’ll help you put it back in the tube,” Andy said, bending down to turn off the tube. “I hope it doesn’t kill the grass. My father will have a cow if his precious hay is injured!”

“It’s too heavy,” Evan yelled and tried to kick the ball into the ground. “It doesn’t want to move.”

“Let’s try taking some hands,” Andy suggested.

“Wow. She doesn’t want to be separated,” Evans said in surprise. "Look. It's sticking together.”

“It’s like taffy,” Andy said. “Have you ever used these toffee machines? These elements stick together into one big piece. ”

“This isn’t Taffy,” Evans said . “It’s disgusting.”

Working together, they were able to lift all the green balloons and put them in the sand. The stuff made a suctioning sound as it filled the tube and both Evan and Andy had trouble getting their hands out of it.

"It's so sticky," Andy said, his face disgusted.

“And the heat,” Evans added. Finally he managed to free his hands from it. “It’s like swallowing my hands,” he said, wiping his hands on his sweater. “Kiss them.”

“Take her home,” Andy said. He looked up at the house to see his mother staring at him from the front window. “O-oh. Dinner time. I have to go.” His eyes narrowed at her swollen brow. “Wait until your friend sees you.”

"He probably won't notice," Evan said sternly. He took the trumpet in his hand. “What are we going to do with these things?”

“We’ll take it to the toy store tomorrow,” Andy replied and took the long walk across the grass to the house.

“Huh?”

“That’s what we’re doing. We’ll just take it.”

Evan didn’t think it was a hot idea. But he has no authority to argue about that now. She watched Andy disappear from the room. Then he slowly turned towards Katherine, her head throbbing, her stomach aching. He sneaks out the front door of the house, sneaks into the garage through a side door and hides the monster’s den of blood. As he disappeared behind the overturned van, he realized the ground was filled to the top.
But I gave Andy a big deal, he thought. The tray was filled with two pairs of threes.

I’ll have to find a bigger place to put it, he decided. tonight. Maybe there’s a box or something in the basement.

He went into the room and decided to clean himself up before he saw Katherine. Still busy in the kitchen, he leaned over the stove and touched up the last bits of dinner. She shifted on her feet and washed. Unable to do much about his swollen and red cheeks, he changed into a clean shirt and a new T-shirt and brushed his hair carefully.

As they sat at the dining room table, Katherine's eyes fell on Evan's swollen cheek. “You were in a fight?” she asked, raising an eyebrow at him suspiciously.
“You are an expensive person, aren't you? Just like your father. The hen always got into the girls’ wives and always mowed down the boys twice her size. ”

“I wasn’t exactly cutting them,” Evan said as he pulled a piece of beef from his broiler in his oven.

Throughout dinner Katherine stared at his swollen eyes. But he didn’t say anything else.

He doesn’t care if I’m hurt or not, Evan thought wryly.

He really doesn't care.

She didn’t ask if it hurt.

In a way, he was grateful. He doesn’t need to get all upset and make a fuss because he was in a fight, maybe call his parents in Atlanta and tell them.

Well... he couldn't wait to call his parents. He couldn’t use the phone because he couldn’t hear it.

Evan downed his large plate of beef. It was very good except for the vegetables.

The silence seemed too loud. He began to think about his problem—demon blood.

Should he tell Katherine?

He could have written any problem on a yellow piece of paper and given it to her to read. It would be nice to tell someone and get an adult to take over the problem and sort it out.

But not Aunt Kathryn, he decided.

It was very sweet.

It was incomprehensible.

He didn't know what to do.

And he doesn't care.

Andy was right. They had to take the stuff back to the toy store. Give it to her. Just get rid of it.

But in the meantime, he had to find something to occupy him.

Evan waited in his room until he heard Kathryn lying in bed, a little after ten hours. Then he walked down the stairs and out to the garage.

18

It was a clear night. The cricketers drew an incessant curtain call. The black sky glowed with stars.

The circular beam in his hand crossed the street and brought Evan closer to the dark parking lot. As he walked in, something hit the ground near the back wall.

Maybe it was the dead leaves that the wind had blown as I opened the door, he thought hopefully.

He stirred the darkness and shone on the wheel’s wheel. The light then went across the roof of the garage and bowed its head, reached the back of the car and removed the monster’s bloody mower.

He moved the light to the center of the pipe and exhaled.

The green thing was shaking in the sky.

It’s growing faster than he thought.

I’ll have to get something bigger to hide it – just for tonight.

The bottom was too heavy to carry with one hand. Setting the lamp in his lap, he grasped the bucket with both hands and lifted the bucket from the floor.

Turning away from her so she wouldn't run, he made his way into the darkness of the room. He stopped at the entrance to the basement stairs, placing his heavy trumpet silently on the floor.

He pressed the wall of the light fixture. A dim light shone down from below, casting a yellow light onto the concrete floor.

There must be something hiding these things in there, Evans thought. He raised the trumpet and slowly made his way down the rough, dark staircase, leaning his shoulder against the wall and steadying himself.

Adjusting his eyes in the dim light, he saw that the basement was a large room, low ceilings, and damp. It was filled with maps, old newspapers and lots of magazines and old appliances covered in yellow wrapping paper.

Something wiped his face as he walked down the stairs.

He let out a shriek and dropped the city, raising his hands to smash the heavy metal bars that seemed to be thrusting towards him. They stuck to her skin, dry and scratchy, as she pulled them on.

He suddenly realized it wasn’t the web that was twitching in his cheek.

It was a spider.

With a deep breath, he washed himself. But even as he watched the insect pass below, he could feel its legs moving across his face.

He pulled away from the wall quickly, his heart pounding now, his eyes searching the open woodwork hidden in shadow along the high wall, and he collided with something on the floor.

"Oh!" He fell to his knees, throwing his hands forward to break his jaw.

The human body!

Someone is lying right next to him!

No.

Calm down, Evan. Shut up, he informed himself.

He pulled himself to his feet and staggered.

It was a dressmaker that he came up with. She may have been a role model for Katherine as a child.

He turned out of the way and his eyes searched the dark room for a container to store the monster’s blood. What was that tall thing at the front desk?

To his surprise, he saw that the toilet was old, and the inside was sticky and cracked. Too big, she realized, and quickly decided to keep the green ribbon inside.

With a loud cry, he lifted the dollar beside the old bottom. His ribs ached from the beating he’d taken, and pain shot through his body.

He waited for the pain to pass, then he changed the pain. The heavy green material swirled out of the dollar and hit the bottom of the glass.

Ivan set the pipe aside and stared at the monster’s blood, watching it flow and spread across the bottom of the bathtub. To his surprise, the tub seemed to be half full.

How fast was this thing growing?!

She was busy in the dishes and was heading back upstairs when she heard the cat meow.

Startled, he left the side of the tub when Sarabeth jumped on his back.

Evan didn’t have time to scream and fell forward, over the side of the tub and into the deep green tub.

19

Ivan landed on his elbow, but the monster’s heavy blood softened the fall. He heard the cat scream again and moved away.

She focused in the water, her arms and legs throbbing as she tried to pull herself up. But the sticky substance sucked and pulled with surprising force.

Her whole body seemed to be gripped, sticking like concrete, and she was trembling and puffing silently, rising to her face. I almost nodded, he realized.

He wants to crush me.

His sweat spread through her body, pooling in her chest, her legs, her neck.

I can't move.

I'm left.

He wants to crush me.

No!

He lifted his head as a green glove began to cover his face.

He then continued to twist her body, grinding himself into her. He pulled himself into an open mouth.

The green substance rose higher, as if reaching for him, pulling and pulling him into her.

Evan grabbed the side of the toilet with both hands, gripped it tightly, and began to push himself. Top, up from the adhesive, pull the fluid out. from the strange power which seemed to draw him with renewed strength.

above. above.

"No!" She managed to scream as the warm, green water rushed towards her.

"No!"

He was grabbing her shoulders now, sliding down her neck, sucking her down and dragging her back into her sticky depths.

down. down.

She touched me, and she understood.

It got me now.

20

"No!" Evan cried out as the green ribbon slid up to his neck.

absorb. He pulled it down.

"No!"

Please try again. above.

Please try again.

above. above.

Yes!

He gripped the sides of her tube, moving upward, pulling, lifting, and squeezing himself with all his might.

Yes! Yes! He would beat her.

It was big, it was big. One more day and she's free.

With a sigh of relief, he fell over the edge of the deck onto the cold floor below.

He lay there pressed against the wet concrete and waited for his breath.

When he looked up, Sarabeth was standing a few feet away, her head cocked to one side, her yellow eyes looking into his, a look of deep satisfaction in her black face.

The next morning, after a good night’s sleep, Evan brought the yellow piece of paper and marker to the breakfast table.

“Okay, okay,” Katherine greeted, setting him a piece of almond butter, “now you look like something a cat has eaten!” She laughed and shook her head.

“Don’t tell me about the cat,” Evan snapped. She set the bowl of soup aside and pointed to the pad in her hand.

“You should see your food get wet,” Kathryn snapped, reaching back to hand the bowl back. “You get a lot of vitamins that way. And it’s a good fat.”

“I don’t care what you sound like,” Evan said cheerfully, knowing she couldn’t hear him. He pointed to the pad again, then began to write, scribbling rapidly in large black letters.

His writing caught his attention. He walked around the table and stood with his back to it, eyes on the pad as he wrote down a hopeful message.

I have a problem, he wrote. I need your help. The bathroom downstairs is filled with monster blood.
And I can’t stop it.

He put down the sign and held the pad to his face.

Looking up at him from the chair, seeing his black face in the morning sunlight, leaning against it in his gray dress, Catherine suddenly seemed very old. Only his eyes, those blue ones that ran fast on his words, seemed so young and alive.

His lips pursed heavily as he read what he was writing. Then Ivan looked back at him and his mouth widened into a smile. She threw her head back and laughed.

Confused by her reaction, Ivan slammed his chair back and jumped up. She reached out a hand and played with it.

“Don’t tell the old lady!” he cried, shaking his head. He turned and walked back to his side table. “I thought you were right. I don’t think you’re like your father at all. He never played games or cheated. Chicken had always been a tough boy. ”

“I didn’t care about the chicken!” Ivan screamed, unable to control himself, and threw the acorn onto the breakfast table in a rage.

His uncle laughed. He didn’t seem to notice that Ivan was looking at him furiously, his hands clenched at his sides.

“Bloody, bloody! What a solid idea!” He wiped the tears of laughter from his eyes with his thumbs. Then his face changed dramatically. He grabbed her ear and pressed it.

“I warned you,” he whispered. “I warned you, be careful.”

“Oh!”

He cried out in pain and let go of his ear, his eyes glowing like blue jewels.

I need to get out of here, Evan thought, rubbing his earlobe. He turned and walked briskly from the kitchen to his room.

I knew it wouldn't help at all, she thought desperately.

She’s a crazy old woman.

I should drag her down to the basement and show her the disgusting things, he thought, throwing the suit he was wearing yesterday on the floor in frustration.

But what's the point? He probably laughs at it too.

He’s not going to help me.

He only had one person he could rely on, he knew.

Andy.

He called, his fingers trembling as he dialed his number.

"Thank you. You’re right,” she said, not giving him a chance to say anything. “We need to pick up stuff at the store.”

“If we can take it,” Andy replied nervously. “The bad blood you gave me came from the coffee pot. I put it in my parents’ snow field, but it’s gotten bigger than that.

“How about the water bottle?” Ivan suggested. "You know. One of those big straw bags? Maybe we can take her in both of them.”

”Good to see,” Andy said. “This situation is very disturbing. He’s doing all these sick things, and he’s very clingy.”

“Tell me,” Evan replied sadly, remembering the night before. “I swam in it.”

“Huh? You can explain later,” she said impatiently. “The toy store opens at ten, I think. I can meet you in the corner for twenty minutes.

“Good stuff.” Evan hung up and went to the garage to find a plastic straw bag.

Andy showed up with his rim wrapped around the handle of his BMX bike. Once again, Evan had to go on foot next to her. His plastic suitcase was swollen and so heavy that he had to be dragged off the road. He couldn’t lift it.

“The tub was filled to the top,” she told Andy, grumbling as she struggled to pull the bag out of the way. “I’m afraid it’s going to break in this bag.”

“Two blocks to go,” he says, trying to stay calm. A car drives slowly by. The driver, a man with long black hair, poked his head out the window and smiled. “What's in the bag? A corpse?”

“It’s rubbish,” Evans told him.

“That’s true,” Andy murmured as the car pulled away.

Many people stopped to watch as they entered the town. "Thank you, Ms. Winslow," Andy called to a friend of his mother.

Mrs. Winslow then waved her hand, looking searchingly at Andy, and focused on the snack.

Andy got on his bike and rode it. Evan continued to carry his bulging bag on his back.

They made their way to the next booth and then started crossing the street to the toy store.

But they both stopped in the middle of the road.

And it was hopelessly interesting.

The door and window of the store were closed. A small hand-printed sign stuck above the door reads: OUT OF BUSINESS.

21

Evan was desperate to remove the disgusting items from the garbage bag and knocked on the door anyway.

“Come on—someone! Someone, open it!

No answer.

He grabbed both hands.

silence.

In the end, Andy had to let him go.

“The store’s closed,” a girl called from across the street. “It closed a few months ago. find? It’s all planned out and everything.”

“It’s very helpful,” Evan said under his breath. He slammed his hand on the door angrily.

“Evan—stop. You’ll hurt yourself,” Andy warned.

“Now what?” Evan asked. “Do you have any other good ideas, Andy?”

He raised his hand. “It’s your turn to create something beautiful.”

Evan was overjoyed. “Maybe I can give it to Katherine and tell her it’s beef. Then he cuts it with the knife he always carries.”

“I don’t think you’re thinking clearly right now,” Andy said, putting a sympathetic hand on her shoulder.

They both looked at the buckets of trash. They seem to be moving – expanding and contracting, like the green orbs inside them are breathing!

“Let’s get back to Catherine,” Evan said, his voice trembling. “Maybe we’ll figure something out down the road.”

Somehow they managed to smuggle the bloody body back to Catherine’s house. The sun has reached the sky. They walked to the back where Evan was drenched in sweat. Her hands hurt. His head was popping.

“Now what?” he asked madly, pulling out the pot of weed.

Andy parked his bike next to the garage. She pointed to a large aluminum garbage can near the garage door. “How about that? He seems very strong.” He immediately walked to the scene to investigate. “And lo and behold—the door sticks.”

“Fine,” Evan agreed, wiping his forehead on his younger hand.

Andy removed the lid of the big bag. She then threw down the contents of her bag. He hit the ground with a sickening thud. She then rushed to help.

Evan.

“It’s too heavy,” Evan cried, struggling to pull the bag up.

“We can do it,” Andy assured.

Working together, they were able to remove the demon’s blood from the paint. It rolled like a tidal wave and pushed noisily alongside the citizen, lifting as if to escape.

With a huge sigh of relief, Ivan slammed the metal lid on it and pressed his hands to the ground.

“Wow!” Andy Castle.

They both stared at Kan for a long moment, as if waiting for him to crack or break. “Now what?” Ivan asked, his face tight with fear.

Before Andy could reply, Katherine was pulled out of the kitchen door. His eyes searched the back until he found them. “Evan—good news!” he called.

Evan and Andy came over and I stared at the trash. Catherine held a yellow book in her hand. Telegram.

“Your mother is coming to pick you up this afternoon,” Catherine said with a big smile on her face.

I think Kathryn is happy to get rid of me, was Evan’s first thought.

And then, letting go of that thought, she jumped up and screamed for joy. It was the best news he had ever received.

“I’m out of here!” he said after his wife returned home. “I’m out of here! I can’t wait!”

Andy didn’t seem to give up his excitement. “You’re throwing a nice barrier at your friend there,” he says, pointing to the trash can.

“Don't worry! I’m out of here! Evan repeats and raises his hand for Andy to high-five him.

She didn’t have sex. “Don't you think we should say a myth to someone who talks about bleeding? Or did you do something about it, before you left?”

But Evan was too happy to think about it now. “Hey Trigger!” she called, running towards the doghouse at the back of the city. “Trigger—we’re going home, man!”

Evan opened the door – and gasped.

22

"trigger!"

The dog that came towards him looked like Trigger. But the Cocker Spaniel would outgrow the pony! It has doubled in size since the day before!

"No!" Evan has to beat the shit while Trigger happily tries to get over him.
“Hey—stay tuned!”

Before Evan could get up, Trigger started yelling viciously. The big dog had passed through the gate and then crossed the street across the street.

“I don’t believe it!” Andy shouted, lifting his hands to his face and looking desperately into the big gray box on the side of the room and out of sight. “It’s too big!”

“We have to stop him! It might hurt someone!” cried Evan.

"Wake up! Trigger—come back!” Still unbalanced, Evan starts to run, calling out in panic, but falls off Andy’s bike and crashes into a garbage can.

"No!" Andy cried out, watching helplessly as the metal could fall with Evan sprawled on top of him. The car hit the road with a loud noise.

The lid popped open and spun.

The green gank is gone.

After he got out of the car, he stood up and seemed to be fully awake. Shaking, and making a loud noise, he straightened himself and stretched himself.

The two children looked around in terror, and the shaking green creature seemed to come to life, like a newly hatched border, stretching itself out, stretching and looking around.

Then he staggered towards Ivan, who was still sprawled on the fallen trumpet.

“Wake up, Ivan!” Andy Castle. "Whew! He's going to roll on you!"

23

"No!"

Evan let out an animalistic yell, a sound that had never been made before - he whirled around as the green ball vibrated towards him.

“Run, Ivan!” Andy shouted. He took her hand and sat her on her feet. “He’s alive!” she screamed. "ride!"

Monster Blood slammed himself against the garage wall. It seemed to stay there for a few seconds. Then he understood and came flying at them with surprising speed.

"Help! Help!"

“Someone—please— help ! ”

Screaming at the top of their lungs, Evan and Andy took off. Running as fast as he could, legs weak and fearful, Evan followed behind Andy down the path towards the front.

"Help! Oh, please! Help us!"

Evan’s voice was hoarse over the screaming. Her heart was pounding in her chest. His eyes bulged.

He turned to see that the Blood Monster was behind them, gaining speed as it flew across the ground, making strange sounds with each stride.

Plup. Plup. Plup.

A young robin was sitting on a tick in the grass and didn’t look up in time. The green man whirled around on her in shock.

"Oh!" Ivan cried, turning around and sucking the bird into the green ball. Wings flapping wildly, the bird gave one last cry and then disappeared inside.

Plup. Plup. Plup.

The monster blood changed direction, bouncing and shuddering, leaving white marks on the grass like giant circles of footprints.

“He’s alive!” Andy cried out, pressing his hands to his eyes. “Oh, my God—he’s alive!”

“What can we do? What can we do?” Evans didn’t know the language of his own fear.

“It’s growing!” Andy cried, pulling his hand away. "ride!"

They are taking a strong wind to the front of the house.

“Hey—what’s going on?” A voice called out.

“Huh?”

Determined by the voice, Evan paused. He looked across the way to see the Beam twins, similar smiles on their rough faces.

“I like my punch,” one of them told Evans. He raised his fist threateningly.

They took a few steps towards Evan and Andy. Then their smiles faded and their mouths fell open in terror as the big green figure appeared, and down they came, spinning as fast as a sledgehammer.

“Be careful!” cried Evan.

"ride!" Andy Castle.

But the two brothers were too frightened to go.

Their eyes were filled with terror and they threw up their arms as if to protect themselves.

Plup. Plup. Plup.

The giant ball of monster blood sped up and flew forward. Evan closed his eyes as he knocked the twins out with a punch.

“Oh!”

"No!"

Both brothers screamed, flailing their arms and pulling themselves away.

“Help us! Please—help us!”

Their bodies twisted and turned as they fought.

But they were stuck. A green goo poured over them and covered them completely.

Then he pulled them inside with a large popcorn machine.

Andy shielded his eyes. “Sick,” he murmured. “Ooh. sick."

Ivan gasped in fear as the Beymer brothers finally stopped fighting.

Their hands were tied. Their faces disappeared into the shaking maze.

The kissing sounds grew louder and pulled the two boys deeper inside of them. With that, the Blood Monster flew up, turned around, and started running again.

Andy and Evan froze, not sure which way to go.

“Split!” cried Evan. “He can’t go after the two of us!”

Andy looked into her terrified face. He opened his mouth, but no sound came out.

“Split up! Split up!” Evan shouted back.

“But—” Andy began.

Before he could say anything, the front door of the house opened and Katherine stepped out onto the golf course.

“Hey—what are you kids doing? What is that?” she screamed, grabbing the TV cover, her eyes filled with fear.

Gaining speed, the giant ball began to move towards the shadow.

Catherine threw up her hands in fear. He stood still for a long moment, as if trying to make sense of what he was seeing. Then, leaving the door open, he spun around and ran into the house.

Plup. Plup.

Monster Blood secretly hesitated forward.

He jumped to his feet once, twice, three times, as if calculating what to do next.

Evan and Andy were panicking at the edge of the grass, trying to catch their breath.

A wave of relief washed over Ivan at the sight of his twin Beymers, still visible in the shaken ground, the faces of the prisoners bouncing inside.

Then the enemy blood surged and flew towards the orb.

"No!" Ivan shouted as he kicked the open door and disappeared from the room.

From the center of the city, Andy and Evan hear Katherine’s bloodcurdling screams.

“She’s taking Katherine,” Evan said madly.

24

Evan got home first. He ran so fast his lungs felt like they were going to explode.

“What are you going to do?” Andy called, following him.

“I don’t know,” Evans replied. He grabbed the TV shutter and pushed himself into the room.

“Titty Catherine!” Evan cried, running into the room.

A large globe fills the center of the small room. The Beymer twins appeared at his side as he bounced and rocked, lifting off the carpet, leaving sticky feet in his wake.

Evan took a few seconds to see his friend. The flying chunk of Monster Blood supported him with fire.

“Titty Catherine—run!” cried Evan.

But even he could see that he had no right to mn.

“Get out of here kids!” cried Kathryn, shrill and shaking, very old.

“But, Aunt Catherine—”

“Get out of here—now!” The old woman insisted, her black hair around her head, her eyes, those piercing blue eyes, looking at him with green orbs as if trying to avoid him.

Evan turned to Andy, unsure of what to do.

Andy's hands were fisted at the sides of his hair, his eyes wide with fear as the bouncing green globe slowly approached the young Ivan.

"leave!" Kathryn shouted back. “Save your lives! I made this thing up! Now I must die for this!”

Evan sighed.

Did he drink well?

What had his wife just said?

The words echoed in his mind, now vivid and vivid – and terrifying.

“I made this thing. Now I must die for it. ”

25

"No!"

Horribly fascinated, as the sick monster blood orb turned towards his grandfather, Ivan felt the room tilt and begin to spin. She gripped the back of Katherine's chair as the images flooded her mind.

He saw the strange collar Kathryn always wore around her neck.

The scrapbooks that hung on the walls of his room.

Sarabelt black cat with bright yellow eyes.

Katherine always rolled her shoulders in the evening.

“I made this thing. Now I must die for it. ”

Evan had seen it all now, and he began to be honest with her.

Evan pictured the day he and Andy brought a wall of monster blood to the local toy store. Katherine insisted on looking at him.

On reading it.

To touch it.

She remembered how he felt her twirl his cock in her hand and examine it carefully. She quietly moves her lips as she reads the sign.

What was he doing? What was he saying?

An idea came to Evan’s mind.

Was she making dinner on the porch?

Did magic increase the blood of the monster? Did magic scare Evan?

But why? He didn’t know Ivan.

Why did he want to scare her? To... kill him?

“Be careful,” he had called out. "be careful."

It was a real wake-up call.

A warning against his magic.

“You did this!” Evan cried out in a voice he didn't recognize. The words were taken from him. He didn't care about them.

“You did this! Make magic! He said, pointing an accusing finger at his friend.

His blue eyes twinkled as they studied his lips. Then her eyes filled with tears that spilled down her cheeks.

"No!" she screamed. "No!"

“You did something to the canvas! You did this, dear Catherine!”

"No!" He screamed and shouted over the bump and bumps of the mountain.

"No!" Kathryn screamed and pressed her back against the beater. “I didn’t do that! He did it!”

And he pointed an accusing finger at Andy.

26

Andy?

Was Katherine blaming Andy?

Evan turned to face Andy.

But Andy also changed.

And Evan immediately realized that his friend didn’t need Andy. He was looking from Andy to Sarabetta.

Standing in the doorway of the living room, the black cat purred and arched its back, its yellow eyes flashing at Kathryn.

“She did it! It’s him!” Kathryn announced, frowning nervously.

The huge orb of green monster blood took a step back, as if Kathryn’s words had pierced him. Shadows moved across the ground as it shook, and light filtered through the bedroom window.

Evan looked at the cat, then back at Andy. She raised her hand, her face frozen in fear and confusion.

I’m researching crazy Katherine, Evan thought.

He lost it completely.

Doesn't make any sense.

None of this makes sense.

“It’s him!” Catherine sat down.

The cat purred in response.

The ground flew out of place, taking the unmoving Beimer brothers within it.

“Oh—look!” Evan shouted as Andy suddenly saw the black cat on its hind legs.

Andy sighed and shook Evan's hand. His hand was as cold as ice.

The cat was still as big as the shadow on the wall. She lifted her legs and gasped for air. Her eyes closed and she was left in the dark.

No one moved.

The only sounds Evan could hear were the sounds of the green globe and his own heartbeat.

All eyes were on the cat as it took off and ran. And as it grows, it changes shape.

He became human.

The shadows of the hands and feet in the darkness.

And then the shadow moved in the darkness.

Sarbet was a girl now, with fiery red hair, white skin and the same yellow, yellow cat eyes that had haunted Evan since he arrived. The girl was wearing a black radius that wrapped around her ankles.

He stood and closed the door, looking at Katherine accusingly.

“See? It is,” said Katherine, quiet now. And the next words were meant only for Sarah: “Your magic is ruined. I will do no more work for you.”

Sarabetta threw her red hair behind one of her dark eyebrows and laughed. “I wonder what you’ll do, Kathryn.”

“No,” Catherine insisted. “For twenty years you used me, salary. For twenty years you kept me here, holding me in your spell. But now I use the blood of this demon to escape.”

Sarabeth laughed again. “There is no escape, genius. You will all die now. All of you.”

27

“You’re all going to die,” Sarabetta repeated. Her smile showed how much she enjoyed saying those words.

Catherine turned to Evan, her eyes showing her fear. “Twenty years ago, I thought you were my friend. I was the only one here. I thought I could trust him. But it had a magic effect on me. And then another. His dark magic rendered me deaf. He refused to read my lips or learn signs. It was one way he kept me in his prison.”

“But, Miss Katherine—” Evan began.

He lifted a finger to his mouth to cover it.

“Sharbet forced me to lie down on a bloody canvas. He warned me not to see my guests, please. I was his slave. His personal servant all these years. He wanted me to be his, to do his dirty work.

Katherine continued, “When you arrived, with his back to the fire escape, he first tried to scare you. But that was impossible. You had nowhere to go. So he’s desperate to get you out of the way. He was afraid that you would know his secret, that you would somehow exclude me from his response. So Sarabeth decided that you must die.”

Katherine's eyes fell. He got excited. “I’m sorry, Ivan. I had no choice, I had no opinion of my own.” He turned his eyes to Sarah. “But that is not the case. Not anymore. Not anymore. If I give in to this horrible creation, Sarabat, I will end your legacy. I will put an end to your dominion over me.”

“Children are still dying,” Sarabat said coldly.

"what?" Catherine's eyes filled with anger. “I’m going, Sarabetta. You can take the kids for a ride. You have no reason to hurt them.”

“They know a lot,” Sarabat replied softly, crossing her tiny hands in front of her, her yellow eyes twinkling.

"We need to get out of here," Evan told Andy as he stared at the boiled green ground.

“But how?” Andy spoke again. "Sarabeth is closing the door."

Evan's eyes searched the small room for an escape route.

nothing.

Sarabeth raised one hand and slowly pulled it towards her, as if summoning the green earth.

She shuddered once, twice, then reached for his hand.

"No! Sarabetta—stop!” Catherine asked.

Catherine ignored her and Sarabeth pointed again.

Green Gangk blew and whirled forward.

"Kill the children," Sarabat ordered.

The Earth giant picked up speed and rolled across the carpet towards Evan and Andy.

“Let’s race to the door,” Evan suggested to Andy, as they turned their backs on the swirling monsterblood.

“SheTl never let us through,” cried Andy.

“Kill the children!” Sarabeth repeated, raising her hands above her head.

“Maybe one of us can handle it!” cried Evan.

“It’s too late!” Andy shouted.

The flying green globe, which flickered, was only a few meters away.

“We—we’re going to steal!” cried Evan.

“Kill the children!” Sarabeth cried out in triumph.

28

The earth rolled forward.

Evan sighed in relief, all hope gone. Frozen in place, it looked like it weighed a thousand pounds.

Andy grabbed her hand.

They both closed their eyes and held their breath and hugged each other.

To their surprise, the Blood Beast let out a loud roar.

“Huh?”

Evan opened his eyes. Andy saw him staring at the door past Sarabat's back.

Blood Monster hadn’t screamed.

"trigger!" cried Evan.

The big dog came through the door.

Sarabetta tried to get out of the way of the dog. But he was very cautious.

Happy to see Evan, Trigger happily leapt at Sarabette - knocking her back.

Under the weight of the massive legs, Sarabeth leaned forward… forward… forward – raising her arms as she collided with the blood of the monster.

A wet slap hit Sarabeth against the green surface of the earth.

Then there are the loud noises.

His hands shot out first. They left quickly. Then Sarabetta was on her knees.

And then it felt like the globe was about to give a violent groan and his body hit the ground. Then his face was revealed to be completely covered.

Sarabeth didn't make a sound and pulled him into her.

Howling with joy, not knowing what he did, the dog ran into the house, facing Evan.

“Down, boy! To the floor!” Evan cried and Trigger jumped up at him in excitement.

And when the dog was flying, he began to lower.

"trigger!" Ivan called out suddenly, reaching for the dog’s grip.

Trigger didn’t seem to notice the change. He licked Evan's face while Evan held him tighter.

Within seconds, Trigger was back to normal Cocker Spaniel size.

“Look—the glue is shrinking, too!” Andy shouted, patting Evan's shoulder.

Ivan turned to see that the green ground was rapidly diminishing.

When he was little, the brothers hit the ground running.

They didn’t move. They were mixed in a broken box. Their eyes are open, unseeing, life. It wasn’t like they were breathing.

Then one touched his eye. The other frowned.

Their doors opened and shut.

“Oh.” One of them gave a long cry.

Then, slowly lifting themselves up, they both looked around the room, confused.

The stunned Robin fell to the ground as well. He screams in pain, beats his wings violently, and wanders around the room in a panic—until he finds an open bedroom window from the ship.

Andy caught Evan as they watched the blood of the monster, expecting Sarabeth to reappear as well.

But there was no Sarabet.

She has disappeared.

Monster Blood, reduced to its original size, lay lifeless and empty, a small green spot on the carpet the size of a tennis ball.

The brothers stood up, their eyes full of fear and confusion. They posed as if they were checking their arms and legs to see if their muscles were working. They then ran out of the room, slamming the TV door behind them.

“It’s over,” Katherine said softly, stepping forward and sliding an arm around Evan and Andy.

"Sarabeth's gone," Evan said, cradling Trigger in his hand, staring at the small amount of monster blood on the ground.

“And I can drink!” Catherine said with a smile, hugging them both. "Sarabeth and her magic are gone forever."

But just as he said that, the screen door opened, and a shadowy figure slid across the bedroom door.

29

"mom!" cried Evan.

She let go of Trigger and he rushed to greet her, throwing his arms around her, and she embraced him.

“What on earth is going on here?” Mrs. Rose asked. “Why did these two men come so suddenly? They looked scared to death'.”

“It’s—it’s a little hard to explain,” Evans told him. “I’m glad to see you!”

Trigger was happy too. After jumping up and down and screaming, Kathryn left Evan’s mother in the kitchen. “I’m making some tea,” she says. “I have a long story to tell you.”

“I hope it’s not too long,” said Mrs. Rose, winking questioningly at Evans. “We’re holding a plane for four hours.”

“Mom I think you’ll like this story,” Evan said and winked at Andy.

The two women disappeared into the kitchen.

Andy and Evan collapsed on the couch, exhausted.

“I thought you’d go forever,” Andy said. “I mean, going to Atlanta and everything—”

“I want to… uh… text you,” Evan said, surprised.

"Yeah. Well,” Andy replied, beaming. “And my dad has a phone card. Maybe I can get a number and… you know… call you.”

"Yeah. It's great," Evans said.

“Can I ask for a small favor?” Andy asked.

"Yeah. Well," Evan replied, looking for his head.

“Well, that’s going to be amazing,” Andy said incredulously. “But can I… uh… can I have some leftover magic blood? You know. Is it going to be like a hallucination or something?”

"Very. It's fine with me," Evans said.

They both averted their eyes to where she came to rest on the carpet.

“Hey—” Andy cried out in surprise.

He was going.
